Nevada, session 83, SB75.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 76.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.100 1. A person shall not conduct a business in this State
unless and until the person obtains a state business license issued by
the Secretary of State. If the person is:
(a) An entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license at the time of filing the initial or annual list.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Not an entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license before conducting a business in this State.
2. An application for a state business license must:
(a) Be made upon a form prescribed by the Secretary of State;
(b) Set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or
intends to transact business, or if the applicant is an entity organized
pursuant to this title and on file with the Secretary of State, the exact
name on file with the Secretary of State, the business identification
number as assigned by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
225.082, and the location in this State of the place or places of
business;
(c) [Be] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, be
accompanied by a fee in the amount of $200, except that if the
applicant is a corporation organized pursuant to chapter 78, 78A or
78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required to file an initial or
annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter 80 of
NRS, the application must be accompanied by a fee of $500; and
(d) Include any other information that the Secretary of State
deems necessary.
 If the applicant is an entity organized pursuant to this title and on
file with the Secretary of State and the applicant has no location in
this State of its place of business, the address of its registered agent
shall be deemed to be the location in this State of its place of
business.
3. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee that must accompany an application for a state
business license pursuant to subsection 2, which must not exceed
the amount of the corresponding fee set forth in subsection 2. If
the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of such
a fee, an application for a state business license must be
accompanied by a fee in the amount established by the Secretary
of State by regulation.
4. The application must be signed pursuant to NRS 239.330 by:
(a) The owner of a business that is owned by a natural person.
(b) A member or partner of an association or partnership.
(c) A general partner of a limited partnership.
(d) A managing partner of a limited-liability partnership.
(e) A manager or managing member of a limited-liability
company.
(f) An officer of a corporation or some other person specifically
authorized by the corporation to sign the application.
[4.] 5. If the application for a state business license is defective
in any respect or the fee required by this section is not paid, the
-
*SB75_R1*

– 5 –
Secretary of State may return the application for correction or
payment.
[5.] 6. A state business license issued pursuant to this section
must contain the business identification number assigned by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 225.082.
[6.] 7. The state business license required to be obtained
pursuant to this section is in addition to any license to conduct
business that must be obtained from the local jurisdiction in which
the business is being conducted.
[7.] 8. For the purposes of this chapter, a person:
(a) Shall be deemed to conduct a business in this State if a
business for which the person is responsible:
(1) Is organized pursuant to this title, other than a business
organized pursuant to:
(I) Chapter 82 or 84 of NRS; or
(II) Chapter 81 of NRS if the business is a nonprofit unit-
owners’ association or a nonprofit religious, charitable, fraternal or
other organization that qualifies as a tax-exempt organization
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
(2) Has an office or other base of operations in this State;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 76.103, has a
registered agent in this State; or
(4) Pays wages or other remuneration to a natural person
who performs in this State any of the duties for which he or she is
paid.
(b) Shall be deemed not to conduct a business in this State if:
(1) The business for which the person is responsible:
(I) Is not organized pursuant to this title;
(II) Does not have an office or base of operations in this
State;
(III) Does not have a registered agent in this State; and
(IV) Does not pay wages or other remuneration to a
natural person who performs in this State any of the duties for which
he or she is paid, other than wages or other remuneration paid to a
natural person for performing duties in connection with an activity
described in subparagraph (2);
(2) The business for which the person is responsible is
conducting activity in this State solely to provide vehicles or
equipment on a short-term basis in response to a wildland fire, a
flood, an earthquake or another emergency; or
(3) The Secretary of State determines that the person is not
conducting a business in this State.
[8.] 9. As used in this section, “registered agent” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 77.230.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 6 –
Sec. 2. NRS 76.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.103 1. A manufacturer who maintains a registered agent
in this State solely because of the requirements set forth in NRS
370.680 and who is not otherwise required to obtain a state business
license pursuant to NRS 76.100 is not deemed, pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection [7] 8 of NRS
76.100, to conduct a business in this State.
2. As used in this section, “manufacturer” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 370.0315.
Sec. 3. NRS 76.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.110 1. If a person fails to obtain a state business license
and pay the fee required pursuant to NRS 76.100 before conducting
a business in this State and the person is:
(a) An entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary of
State pursuant to this title, the person:
(1) [Shall] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
shall pay a penalty of $100 in addition to the annual state business
license fee for each year in which the entity fails to obtain a state
business license;
(2) Shall be deemed to have not complied with the
requirement to file an annual list with the Secretary of State; and
(3) Is subject to all applicable provisions relating to the
failure to file an annual list, including, without limitation, the
provisions governing default and revocation of its charter or right to
transact business in this State, except that the person is required to
pay the penalty set forth in subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a).
(b) Not an entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary
of State, the person shall , except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2, pay a penalty in the amount of $100 in addition to the
annual state business license fee for each year in which the person
has conducted business in this State without a state business license.
2. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the penalty required to be paid pursuant to this section
by a person who fails to obtain a state business license and pay the
fee required pursuant to NRS 76.100, which must not exceed
$100. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of such a penalty, the amount of any penalty required to
be paid pursuant to this section must be the amount established by
the Secretary of State by regulation.
3. The Secretary of State may refuse to issue a state business
license to a person that has failed to pay the fees and penalties
required by this chapter.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 7 –
Sec. 4. NRS 76.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 [,] or
8, a person who applies for renewal of a state business license shall
submit a fee in the amount of $200 to the Secretary of State:
(a) If the person is an entity required to file an annual list with
the Secretary of State pursuant to this title, at the time the person
submits the annual list to the Secretary of State, unless the person
submits a certificate or other form evidencing the dissolution of the
entity; or
(b) If the person is not an entity required to file an annual list
with the Secretary of State pursuant to this title, on the last day of
the month in which the anniversary date of issuance of the state
business license occurs in each year, unless the person submits a
written statement to the Secretary of State, at least 10 days before
that date, indicating that the person will not be conducting a
business in this State after that date.
2. [If] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, if the
person applying for the renewal of a state business license pursuant
to subsection 1 is a corporation organized pursuant to chapter 78,
78A or 78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required to file an
initial or annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter
80 of NRS, the fee for the renewal of a state business license is
$500.
3. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing an application for renewal of the state business license of a
person who holds a state business license, provide to the person a
notice of the state business license fee due pursuant to this section
and a reminder to file the application for renewal required pursuant
to this section. The notice required pursuant to this subsection may
be provided electronically, unless the person has requested to
receive communications by mail. Failure of any person to receive a
notice does not excuse the person from the penalty imposed by law.
4. If a person fails to submit the annual state business license
fee required pursuant to this section in a timely manner and the
person is:
(a) An entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary of
State pursuant to this title, the person:
(1) [Shall] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8,
shall pay a penalty of $100 in addition to the annual state business
license fee;
(2) Shall be deemed to have not complied with the
requirement to file an annual list with the Secretary of State; and
(3) Is subject to all applicable provisions relating to the
failure to file an annual list, including, without limitation, the
provisions governing default and revocation of its charter or right to
-
*SB75_R1*

– 8 –
transact business in this State, except that the person is required to
pay the penalty set forth in subparagraph (1).
(b) Not an entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary
of State, the person shall , except as otherwise provided in
subsection 8, pay a penalty in the amount of $100 in addition to the
annual state business license fee. The Secretary of State shall
provide to the person a written notice that:
(1) Must include a statement indicating the amount of the
fees and penalties required pursuant to this section and the costs
remaining unpaid.
(2) May be provided electronically, if the person has
requested to receive communications by electronic transmission, by
electronic mail or other electronic communication.
5. The Secretary of State may establish a procedure whereby
a person who has provided payment information to the Secretary
of State may elect to automatically apply for renewal of his or her
state business license and pay the state business license fee
required by this section. Failure of any person to pay the state
business license fee as a result of not maintaining current
payment information with the Secretary of State does not excuse
the person from the penalty imposed by law for failure to timely
pay the state business license fee.
6. A person who continues to do business in this State without
renewing the person’s state business license before its renewal date
is subject to the fees and penalties provided for in this section unless
the person files a certificate of cancellation of the person’s state
business license with the Secretary of State.
[6.] 7. The Secretary of State shall waive the annual state
business license fee and any related penalty imposed on a natural
person or partnership if the natural person or partnership provides
evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the natural person
or partnership conducted no business in this State during the period
for which the fees and penalties would be waived.
8. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee required by this section for the renewal of a
state business license and the penalty required to be paid pursuant
to this section by a person who fails to pay the annual state
business license fee in a timely manner. The fee or penalty
established by the Secretary of State must not exceed the amount
of the fee or penalty, as applicable, set forth in this section. If the
Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of:
(a) The fee for the renewal of a state business license, the
amount of the fee for such renewal is the amount of the fee
established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 9 –
(b) The penalty required to be paid pursuant to this section by
a person who fails to pay the annual state business license fee in a
timely manner, the amount of any such penalty must be the
amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
Sec. 4.5. NRS 77.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
77.300 Whenever a provision of this chapter requires that a
filing state an address, the filing must state:
1. An actual street address or rural route box number in this
State; [and]
2. A mailing address in this State, if different from the address
under subsection 1 [.] ; and
3. An electronic mail address.
Sec. 5. NRS 78.028 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.028 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 6. NRS 78.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.045 1. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing
any articles of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of
articles of incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the
laws of this State which provides that the name of the corporation
contains the word “bank” or “trust,” unless:
(a) It appears from the articles or the certificate of amendment
that the corporation proposes to carry on business as a banking or
trust company, exclusively or in connection with its business as a
bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or thrift company;
and
(b) The articles or certificate of amendment is first approved by
the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
2. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter if it appears from the articles or the certificate of
amendment that the business to be carried on by the corporation is
subject to supervision by the Commissioner of Insurance or by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions, unless the articles or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 10 –
certificate of amendment is approved by the Commissioner who will
supervise the business of the corporation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation or
any certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of any
corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this State if the name of
the corporation contains the words “engineer,” “engineered,”
“engineering,” “professional engineer,” “registered engineer” or
“licensed engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the corporation are licensed
to practice engineering pursuant to the laws of this State; or
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the corporation is exempt from the
prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation or
any certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of any
corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this State if the name of
the corporation contains the words “architect,” “architecture,”
“registered architect,” “licensed architect,” “registered interior
designer,” “registered interior design,” “residential designer,”
“registered residential designer,” “licensed residential designer” or
“residential design” unless [the] :
(a) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design certifies that:
[(a)] (1) The principals of the corporation are holders of a
certificate of registration to practice architecture or residential
design or to practice as a registered interior designer, as applicable,
pursuant to the laws of this State; or
[(b)] (2) The corporation is qualified to do business in this State
pursuant to NRS 623.349 [.] ; or
(b) The principals of the corporation present documentation
satisfactory to the Secretary of State showing that:
(1) The principals are holders of a certificate of registration
to practice architecture or residential design or to practice as a
registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
(2) The corporation is qualified to do business in this State
pursuant to NRS 623.349.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this
State which provides that the name of the corporation contains the
word “accountant,” “accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 11 –
“auditing” unless the Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies
that the corporation:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the corporation is not
engaged in the practice of accounting and is not offering to practice
accounting in this State.
6. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed or existing pursuant to the
laws of this State which provides that the name of the corporation
contains the words “common-interest community,” “community
association,” “master association,” “unit-owners’ association” or
“homeowners’ association” or if it appears in the articles of
incorporation or certificate of amendment that the purpose of the
corporation is to operate as a unit-owners’ association pursuant to
chapter 116 or 116B of NRS unless the Administrator of the Real
Estate Division of the Department of Business and Industry certifies
that the corporation has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
7. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 do not apply to any
corporation, whose securities are publicly traded and regulated by
the Securities Exchange Act, which does not engage in the practice
of professional engineering, architecture or residential design or
interior design, as applicable.
8. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions and the
Commissioner of Insurance may approve or disapprove the articles
or amendments referred to them pursuant to the provisions of this
section.
Sec. 7. NRS 78.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.150 1. A corporation organized pursuant to the laws of
this State shall, at the time of the filing of its articles of
incorporation with the Secretary of State or, if the corporation has
selected an alternative due date pursuant to subsection 12, on or
before that alternative due date, file with the Secretary of State a list,
on a form furnished by the Secretary of State, containing:
(a) The name of the corporation;
(b) The file number of the corporation, if known;
(c) The names and titles of the president, secretary and treasurer,
or the equivalent thereof, and of all the directors of the corporation;
-
*SB75_R1*

– 12 –
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each officer and
director listed, following the name of the officer or director; and
(e) The signature of an officer of the corporation, or some other
person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the list,
certifying that the list is true, complete and accurate.
2. The corporation shall annually thereafter, on or before the
last day of the month in which the anniversary date of incorporation
occurs in each year, or, if, pursuant to subsection 12, the corporation
has selected an alternative due date for filing the list required by
subsection 1, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, file
with the Secretary of State, on a form furnished by the Secretary of
State, an annual list containing all of the information required in
subsection 1.
3. Each list required by subsection 1 or 2 must be accompanied
by:
(a) A declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(1) The corporation has complied with the provisions of
chapter 76 of NRS;
(2) The corporation acknowledges that pursuant to NRS
239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false or
forged instrument for filing with the Office of the Secretary of State;
and
(3) None of the officers or directors identified in the list has
been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of an officer or director in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
(b) A statement as to whether the corporation is a publicly
traded company. If the corporation is a publicly traded company, the
corporation must list its Central Index Key. The Secretary of State
shall include on the Secretary of State’s Internet website the Central
Index Key of a corporation provided pursuant to this paragraph and
instructions describing the manner in which a member of the public
may obtain information concerning the corporation from the
Securities and Exchange Commission.
4. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing the list required by:
(a) Subsection 1, the corporation shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee of $150.
(b) Subsection 2, the corporation shall pay to the Secretary of
State, if the amount represented by the total number of shares
provided for in the articles is:

$75,000 or less .................................................................. $150
Over $75,000 and not over $200,000 ................................. 200
-
*SB75_R1*

– 13 –
Over $200,000 and not over $500,000 ............................. $300
Over $500,000 and not over $1,000,000 ............................ 400
Over $1,000,000:
For the first $1,000,000 ................................................. 400
For each additional $500,000 or fraction thereof .......... 275
 The maximum fee which may be charged pursuant to paragraph
(b) for filing the annual list is $11,125. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee which must be paid
for filing a list required by subsection 1 or 2, which must not
exceed the amount of the fee or the maximum fee specified in this
subsection. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of such a fee, upon filing a list required by subsection 1 or
2, the corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee in the
amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.

5. If a corporation files an amended list of directors and
officers with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the date on
which the list required by subsection 1 is filed, the corporation or
the resigning director or officer is not required to pay a fee for filing
the amended list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if a director or
officer of a corporation resigns and the resignation is not reflected
on the annual or amended list of directors and officers, the
corporation or the resigning director or officer shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
7. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 2, provide to each
corporation which is required to comply with the provisions of NRS
78.150 to 78.185, inclusive, and which has not become delinquent, a
notice of the fee due pursuant to subsection 4 and a reminder to file
the annual list required by subsection 2. Failure of any corporation
to receive a notice does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by
law.
8. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 or 2 is defective in any respect or the fee required by subsection 4
is not paid, the Secretary of State may return the list for correction
or payment.
9. An annual list for a corporation not in default which is
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year and must
be accompanied by the appropriate fee as provided in subsection 4
for filing. A payment submitted pursuant to this subsection does not
satisfy the requirements of subsection 2 for the year to which the
due date is applicable.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 14 –
10. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list
required by subsection 1 or 2 which identifies an officer or director
with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or
persons exercising the power or authority of an officer or director in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set
forth in NRS 225.084.
11. For the purposes of this section, a stockholder is not
deemed to exercise actual control of the daily operations of a
corporation based solely on the fact that the stockholder has voting
control of the corporation.
12. The Secretary of State may allow a corporation to select an
alternative due date for filing the list required by subsection 1.
13. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 12.
Sec. 8. NRS 78.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.170 1. Each corporation which is required to make a filing
and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 78.150 to 78.185, inclusive, and
which refuses or neglects to do so within the time provided shall be
deemed in default.
2. Upon notification from the Administrator of the Real Estate
Division of the Department of Business and Industry that a
corporation which is a unit-owners’ association as defined in NRS
116.011 or 116B.030 has failed to register pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625 or failed to pay the fees pursuant to
NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State shall deem the
corporation to be in default. If, after the corporation is deemed to be
in default, the Administrator notifies the Secretary of State that the
corporation has registered pursuant to NRS 116.31158 or 116B.625
and paid the fees pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620, the
Secretary of State shall reinstate the corporation if the corporation
complies with the requirements for reinstatement as provided in this
section and NRS 78.180 and 78.185.
3. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the penalty for default, which must not exceed $75. If
the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of such
a penalty for default, there must be added to the amount of the fee
a penalty in the amount established by the Secretary of State by
regulation. The fee and penalty must be collected as provided in
this chapter.
Sec. 9. NRS 78.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.180 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 78.152, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a
corporation which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to transact
-
*SB75_R1*

– 15 –
business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and shall restore
to the corporation its right to carry on business in this State, and to
exercise its corporate privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required by NRS 78.150;
(2) The statement required by NRS 78.153, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly elected board of directors of the corporation or, if the
corporation does not have a board of directors, the equivalent of
such a board; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 78.150 and
78.170 for each year or portion thereof during which it failed to file
each required annual list in a timely manner;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 78.153, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the
corporation must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the corporation, the
Secretary of State shall issue to the corporation a certificate of
reinstatement if the corporation:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to subsection 7 of
NRS 78.785.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation of
the charter occurred only by reason of failure to pay the fees and
penalties.
4. If a corporate charter has been revoked pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and has remained revoked for a period of
5 consecutive years, the charter must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 78.185, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the corporation forfeited its right to transact business under
the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the corporation’s right
-
*SB75_R1*

– 16 –
to transact business as if such right had at all times remained in full
force and effect.
Sec. 9.5. NRS 78.573 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.573 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a corporation
whose charter has been revoked to dissolve without paying
additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for filing a
certificate of dissolution required by NRS 78.780,] if the corporation
provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the
corporation did not transact business in this State or as a corporation
organized pursuant to the laws of this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its charter was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its charter was
revoked and the corporation paid the fees and penalties for the
portion of that period in which the corporation transacted business
in this State or as a corporation organized pursuant to the laws of
this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 10. NRS 78.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.760 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section,
the fee for filing articles of incorporation is prescribed in the
following schedule:

If the amount represented by the total number of shares
provided for in the articles is:
$75,000 or less .................................................................... $75
Over $75,000 and not over $200,000 ................................. 175
Over $200,000 and not over $500,000 ............................... 275
Over $500,000 and not over $1,000,000 ............................ 375
Over $1,000,000:
For the first $1,000,000 ................................................. 375
For each additional $500,000 or fraction thereof .......... 275

2. The maximum fee which may be charged pursuant to this
section:
(a) Is $35,000 for the original filing of the articles of
incorporation.
(b) Is $34,925 for a subsequent filing of any instrument which
authorizes an increase in stock.
3. For the purposes of computing the filing fees according to
the schedule in subsection 1, the amount represented by the total
number of shares provided for in the articles of incorporation is:
(a) The aggregate par value of the shares, if only shares with a
par value are therein provided for;
-
*SB75_R1*

– 17 –
(b) The product of the number of shares multiplied by $1,
regardless of any lesser amount prescribed as the value or
consideration for which shares may be issued and disposed of, if
only shares without par value are therein provided for; or
(c) The aggregate par value of the shares with a par value plus
the product of the number of shares without par value multiplied by
$1, regardless of any lesser amount prescribed as the value or
consideration for which the shares without par value may be issued
and disposed of, if shares with and without par value are therein
provided for.
 For the purposes of this subsection, shares with no prescribed par
value shall be deemed shares without par value.
4. The Secretary of State shall calculate filing fees pursuant to
this section with respect to shares with a par value of less than one-
tenth of a cent as if the par value were one-tenth of a cent.
5. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee for filing articles of incorporation, which must
be based on the amount represented by the total number of shares
provided for in the articles and which must not exceed the amount
of the fee set forth in subsection 1 or the maximum fee specified in
subsection 2. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of the fee for filing articles of incorporation, the fee for
filing articles of incorporation must be in the amount established
by the Secretary of State by regulation.
Sec. 11. NRS 78A.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78A.015 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 12. NRS 80.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
80.010 1. Before commencing or doing any business in this
State, each corporation organized pursuant to the laws of another
state, territory, the District of Columbia, a possession of the United
States or a foreign country that enters this State to do business must:
(a) File in the Office of the Secretary of State:
(1) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310. The
street address of the registered agent is the registered office of the
corporation in this State.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 18 –
(2) A statement signed by an officer of the corporation, or
some other person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign
the statement, setting forth:
(I) A general description of the purposes of the
corporation;
(II) The authorized stock of the corporation and the
number and par value of shares having par value and the number of
shares having no par value;
(III) A declaration of the existence of the corporation and
the name of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or the governmental
acts or other instrument of authority by which the corporation was
created; and
(IV) A declaration that the corporation is in good standing
in the jurisdiction of its incorporation or creation.
(b) Lodge in the Office of the Secretary of State a copy of the
record most recently filed by the corporation in the jurisdiction of its
incorporation setting forth the authorized stock of the corporation,
the number of par-value shares and their par value, and the number
of no-par-value shares.
2. The Secretary of State shall not file the records required by
subsection 1 for any foreign corporation whose name is not
distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of State from the
names of all other artificial persons formed, organized, registered or
qualified pursuant to the provisions of this title that are on file in the
Office of the Secretary of State and all names that are reserved in
the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this
title, unless the written, acknowledged consent of the holder of the
name on file or reserved name to use the same name or the
requested similar name accompanies the articles of incorporation.
3. For the purposes of this section and NRS 80.012, a proposed
name is not distinguishable from a name on file or reserved solely
because one or the other names contains distinctive lettering, a
distinctive mark, a trademark or trade name, or any combination
thereof.
4. The name of a foreign corporation whose charter has been
revoked, which has merged and is not the surviving entity or whose
existence has otherwise terminated is available for use by any other
artificial person.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing the records
required by subsection 1 or NRS 80.110 for any foreign corporation
if the name of the corporation contains the words “engineer,”
“engineered,” “engineering,” “professional engineer,” “registered
engineer” or “licensed engineer” unless the State Board of
Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors certifies that:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 19 –
(a) The principals of the corporation are licensed to practice
engineering pursuant to the laws of this State; or
(b) The corporation is exempt from the prohibitions of
NRS 625.520.
6. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing the records
required by subsection 1 or NRS 80.110 for any foreign corporation
if the name of the corporation contains the words “architect,”
“architecture,” “registered architect,” “licensed architect,”
“registered interior designer,” “registered interior design,”
“residential designer,” “registered residential designer,” “licensed
residential designer” or “residential design” unless [the] :
(a) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design certifies that:
[(a)] (1) The principals of the corporation are holders of a
certificate of registration to practice architecture or residential
design or to practice as a registered interior designer, as applicable,
pursuant to the laws of this State; or
[(b)] (2) The corporation is qualified to do business in this State
pursuant to NRS 623.349 [.] ; or
(b) The principals of the corporation present documentation
satisfactory to the Secretary of State showing that:
(1) The principals are holders of a certificate of registration
to practice architecture or residential design or to practice as a
registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
(2) The corporation is qualified to do business in this State
pursuant to NRS 623.349.
7. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing the records
required by subsection 1 or NRS 80.110 for any foreign corporation
if it appears from the records that the business to be carried on by
the corporation is subject to supervision by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions, unless the Commissioner certifies that:
(a) The corporation has obtained the authority required to do
business in this State; or
(b) The corporation is not subject to or is exempt from the
requirements for obtaining such authority.
8. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing the records
required by subsection 1 or NRS 80.110 for any foreign corporation
if the name of the corporation contains the word “accountant,”
“accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or “auditing” unless the
Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies that the foreign
corporation:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 20 –
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the foreign corporation is
not engaged in the practice of accounting and is not offering to
practice accounting in this State.
9. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations that interpret
the requirements of subsections 1 to 8, inclusive.
10. A person shall not file the records required by subsection 1
for any illegal purpose or with the fraudulent intent to conceal any
business activity, or lack thereof, from another person or a
governmental agency.
Sec. 13. NRS 80.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
80.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 [,] or
4, foreign corporations shall pay the same fees to the Secretary of
State as are required to be paid by corporations organized pursuant
to the laws of this State, but the amount of fees to be charged must
not exceed:
(a) The sum of $35,000 for filing records for initial
qualification; or
(b) The sum of $34,925 for each subsequent filing of a
certificate increasing authorized capital stock.
2. If the corporate records required to be filed set forth only the
total number of shares of stock the corporation is authorized to issue
without reference to value, the authorized shares shall be deemed to
be without par value and the filing fee must be computed pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS 78.760.
3. [Foreign] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
foreign corporations which are nonprofit corporations and which do
not have or issue shares of stock shall pay the same fees to the
Secretary of State as are required to be paid by nonprofit
corporations organized pursuant to the laws of this State.
4. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee that a foreign corporation, including, without
limitation, a foreign corporation which is a nonprofit corporation
and which does not have or issue shares of stock, must pay for
filing records for initial qualification, which must not exceed the
fee prescribed by statute for corporations or nonprofit
corporations, as applicable, organized pursuant to the laws of this
State or the limit specified in subsection 1. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a fee, the amount of
the fee that a foreign corporation, including, without limitation, a
foreign corporation which is a nonprofit corporation and which
does not have or issue shares of stock, must be in the amount
established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
5. The fee for filing a notice of withdrawal from the State of
Nevada by a foreign corporation is $100.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 21 –
Sec. 14. NRS 80.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
80.110 1. Each foreign corporation doing business in this
State shall, at the time that the information required by NRS 80.010
is filed with the Secretary of State, or, if the foreign corporation has
selected an alternative due date pursuant to subsection 10, on or
before that alternative due date, and annually thereafter on or before
the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of its
qualification to do business in this State occurs in each year, or, if
applicable, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, file
with the Secretary of State a list, on a form furnished by the
Secretary of State, that contains:
(a) The names and addresses, either residence or business, of its
president, secretary and treasurer, or the equivalent thereof, and all
of its directors; and
(b) The signature of an officer of the corporation or some other
person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the list.
2. Each list filed pursuant to subsection 1 must be accompanied
by:
(a) A declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(1) The foreign corporation has complied with the provisions
of chapter 76 of NRS;
(2) The foreign corporation acknowledges that pursuant to
NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false
or forged instrument for filing with the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(3) None of the officers or directors identified in the list has
been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of an officer or director in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
(b) A statement as to whether the foreign corporation is a
publicly traded company. If the corporation is a publicly traded
company, the corporation must list its Central Index Key. The
Secretary of State shall include on the Secretary of State’s Internet
website the Central Index Key of a corporation provided pursuant to
this subsection and instructions describing the manner in which a
member of the public may obtain information concerning the
corporation from the Securities and Exchange Commission.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, the corporation shall
pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, the corporation
shall pay to the Secretary of State, if the amount represented by the
total number of shares provided for in the articles is:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 22 –
$75,000 or less .................................................................. $150
Over $75,000 and not over $200,000 ................................. 200
Over $200,000 and not over $500,000 ............................... 300
Over $500,000 and not over $1,000,000 ............................ 400
Over $1,000,000:
For the first $1,000,000 ................................................. 400
For each additional $500,000 or fraction thereof .......... 275
 The maximum fee which may be charged pursuant to paragraph
(b) for filing the annual list is $11,125. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee which must be paid
for filing the initial list and each annual list required by
subsection 1, which must not exceed the amount of the fee or the
maximum fee specified in this subsection. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the
initial list and each annual list, the foreign corporation shall pay
to the Secretary of State a fee in the amount established by the
Secretary of State by regulation.

4. If a foreign corporation files an amended list of directors and
officers with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the date on
which the initial list required by subsection 1 is filed, the foreign
corporation or the resigning director or officer is not required to pay
a fee for filing the amended list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a director or
officer of a corporation resigns and the resignation is not reflected
on the annual or amended list of directors and officers, the
corporation or the resigning director or officer shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
6. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
corporation which is required to comply with the provisions of NRS
80.110 to 80.175, inclusive, and which has not become delinquent, a
notice of the fee due pursuant to subsection 3 and a reminder to file
the list pursuant to subsection 1. Failure of any corporation to
receive a notice does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by the
provisions of NRS 80.110 to 80.175, inclusive.
7. An annual list for a corporation not in default which is
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year and does
not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to which the
due date is applicable.
8. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list required
by subsection 1 which identifies an officer or director with the
fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or persons
exercising the power or authority of an officer or director in
-
*SB75_R1*

– 23 –
furtherance of any unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set
forth in NRS 225.084.
9. For the purposes of this section, a stockholder is not deemed
to exercise actual control of the daily operations of a corporation
based solely on the fact that the stockholder has voting control of
the corporation.
10. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign corporation to
select an alternative due date for filing the initial list required by
subsection 1.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 10.
Sec. 15. NRS 80.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
80.150 1. Any corporation which is required to make a filing
and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 80.110 to 80.175, inclusive, and
which refuses or neglects to do so within the time provided is in
default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75, and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date
of incorporation occurs in which filing was required, the defaulting
corporation by reason of its default forfeits its right to transact any
business within this State. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the penalty for default, which must not
exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of such a penalty, for default there must be added to
the amount of the fee a penalty in the amount established by the
Secretary of State by regulation. The fee and penalty must be
collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 16. NRS 80.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
80.170 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 or NRS 80.113, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a corporation
which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to transact business
under the provisions of this chapter and shall restore to the
corporation its right to transact business in this State, and to exercise
its corporate privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list as provided in NRS 80.110 and 80.140;
(2) The statement required by NRS 80.115, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly elected board of directors of the foreign corporation or, if
-
*SB75_R1*

– 24 –
the foreign corporation does not have a board of directors, the
equivalent of such a board; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 80.110 and
80.150 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 80.115, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the
corporation must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the corporation, the
Secretary of State shall issue to the corporation a certificate of
reinstatement if the corporation:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to subsection 7 of
NRS 78.785.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a corporation to transact business in this State
has been forfeited pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and has
remained forfeited for a period of 5 consecutive years, the right is
not subject to reinstatement.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 80.175, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the corporation forfeited its right to transact business under
the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the corporation’s right
to transact business as if such right had at all times remained in full
force and effect.
Sec. 17. NRS 81.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
81.003 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 25 –
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 18. NRS 82.193 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.193 1. A corporation shall have a registered agent in the
manner provided in NRS 78.090 and 78.097. The registered agent
and the corporation shall comply with the provisions of those
sections.
2. Upon notification from the Administrator of the Real Estate
Division of the Department of Business and Industry that a
corporation which is a unit-owners’ association as defined in
NRS 116.011 or 116B.030 has failed to register pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625 or failed to pay the fees pursuant to NRS
116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State shall deem the
corporation to be in default. If, after the corporation is deemed to be
in default, the Administrator notifies the Secretary of State that the
corporation has registered pursuant to NRS 116.31158 or 116B.625
and paid the fees pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620, the
Secretary of State shall reinstate the corporation if the corporation
complies with the requirements for reinstatement as provided in this
section and NRS 78.180 and 78.185.
3. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a
corporation is subject to the provisions of NRS 78.150 to 78.185,
inclusive, except that:
(a) The fee for filing a list is $50;
(b) The penalty added for default is $50; and
(c) The fee for reinstatement is $100.
4. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee that a corporation must pay for filing a list, the
penalty added for default and the fee for reinstatement, which
must not exceed the corresponding amount set forth in subsection
3. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
the fee for filing a list, the penalty added for default or the fee for
reinstatement, the fee for filing a list, the penalty added for default
and the fee for reinstatement must be in the amount established by
the Secretary of State by regulation.
Sec. 18.5. NRS 82.442 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.442 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a nonprofit
corporation whose charter has been revoked to dissolve without
paying additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for filing a
certificate of dissolution required by NRS 82.531,] if the nonprofit
corporation provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of State
that the nonprofit corporation did not transact business in this State
-
*SB75_R1*

– 26 –
or as a nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to the laws of this
State:
(a) During the entire period for which its charter was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its charter was
revoked and the nonprofit corporation paid the fees and penalties for
the portion of that period in which the nonprofit corporation
transacted business in this State or as a nonprofit corporation
organized pursuant to the laws of this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 19. NRS 82.523 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.523 1. Each foreign nonprofit corporation doing business
in this State shall, at the time of the filing of its application for
registration as a foreign nonprofit corporation with the Secretary of
State, or, if the foreign nonprofit corporation has selected an
alternative due date pursuant to subsection 10, on or before that
alternative due date, and annually thereafter on or before the last day
of the month in which the anniversary date of its qualification to do
business in this State occurs in each year, or, if applicable, on or
before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of the
alternative due date occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of
State a list, on a form furnished by the Secretary of State, that
contains:
(a) The name of the foreign nonprofit corporation;
(b) The file number of the foreign nonprofit corporation, if
known;
(c) The names and titles of the president, the secretary and the
treasurer, or the equivalent thereof, and all the directors of the
foreign nonprofit corporation;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of the president,
secretary and treasurer, or the equivalent thereof, and each director
of the foreign nonprofit corporation; and
(e) The signature of an officer of the foreign nonprofit
corporation, or some other person specifically authorized by the
foreign nonprofit corporation to sign the list, certifying that the list
is true, complete and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to this section must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The foreign nonprofit corporation has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The foreign nonprofit corporation acknowledges that
pursuant to NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly
offer any false or forged instrument for filing with the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
-
*SB75_R1*

– 27 –
(c) None of the officers or directors identified in the list has
been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of an officer or director in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing the initial list and each annual list pursuant to this
section, the foreign nonprofit corporation must pay to the Secretary
of State a fee of $50. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the fee which must be paid for filing the
initial list and each annual list pursuant to this section, which
must not exceed $50. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the initial list and
each annual list, the foreign corporation shall pay to the Secretary
of State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
4. If a foreign nonprofit corporation files an amended list of
officers and directors with the Secretary of State within 60 days
after the filing of the initial list pursuant to this section, the foreign
nonprofit corporation is not required to pay a fee for filing the
amended list.
5. The Secretary of State shall, 60 days before the last day for
filing each annual list, provide to each foreign nonprofit corporation
which is required to comply with the provisions of NRS 82.523 to
82.524, inclusive, and which has not become delinquent, a notice of
the fee due pursuant to subsection 3 and a reminder to file the list
required pursuant to subsection 1. Failure of any foreign nonprofit
corporation to receive a notice does not excuse it from the penalty
imposed by the provisions of NRS 82.523 to 82.524, inclusive.
6. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
7. An annual list for a foreign nonprofit corporation not in
default that is received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days
before its due date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous
year and does not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the
year to which the due date is applicable.
8. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list pursuant
to this section which identifies an officer or director with the
fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or persons
exercising the power or authority of an officer or director in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set
forth in NRS 225.084.
9. For the purposes of this section, a member of a foreign
nonprofit corporation is not deemed to exercise actual control of the
daily operations of the foreign nonprofit corporation based solely on
-
*SB75_R1*

– 28 –
the fact that the member has voting control of the foreign nonprofit
corporation.
10. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign nonprofit
corporation to select an alternative due date for filing the initial list
required by this section.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 10.
Sec. 20. NRS 82.5235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.5235 1. Each foreign nonprofit corporation which is
required to make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 82.523
to 82.524, inclusive, and which refuses or neglects to do so within
the time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$50, and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date
of the foreign nonprofit corporation occurs, the defaulting foreign
nonprofit corporation forfeits its right to transact any business
within this State. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the penalty for default, which must not
exceed $50. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of such a penalty for default, there must be added to
the amount of the fee a penalty in the amount established by the
Secretary of State by regulation. The fee and penalty must be
collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 21. NRS 82.5237 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.5237 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 82.183, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a foreign
nonprofit corporation which has forfeited or which forfeits its right
to transact business pursuant to the provisions of NRS 82.523 to
82.524, inclusive, and restore to the foreign nonprofit corporation its
right to transact business in this State, and to exercise its corporate
privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) A list as provided in NRS 82.523; and
(2) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly elected board of directors of the foreign nonprofit
corporation or, if the foreign nonprofit corporation does not have a
board of directors, the equivalent of such a board; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 29 –
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 82.523 and
82.5235 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited; and
(2) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $100 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $100. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the foreign
nonprofit corporation must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the foreign nonprofit
corporation, the Secretary of State shall issue to the foreign
nonprofit corporation a certificate of reinstatement if the foreign
nonprofit corporation:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the fees as provided in subsection 7 of NRS 78.785.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a foreign nonprofit corporation to transact
business in this State has been forfeited pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter and has remained forfeited for a period of 5 consecutive
years, the right to transact business must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 82.5239, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the foreign nonprofit corporation forfeited its right to transact
business under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the
foreign nonprofit corporation’s right to transact business as if such
right had at all times remained in full force and effect.
Sec. 22. NRS 82.528 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.528 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 30 –
Sec. 23. NRS 82.531 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.531 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the fee for filing articles of incorporation, amendments
to or restatements of articles of incorporation [,] and certificates
pursuant to NRS 82.061 and 82.063 [and records for dissolution] is
$50 for each record. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the fee for filing articles of incorporation, which must
not exceed $50 for each record. If the Secretary of State
establishes the fee by regulation, the fee for filing articles of
incorporation must be in the amount established by the Secretary
of State by regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 82.193 and subsection
1, the fees for filing records are those set forth in NRS 78.765 to
78.785, inclusive.
Sec. 24. NRS 84.008 is hereby amended to read as follows:
84.008 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 25. NRS 84.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
84.015 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the fee for filing articles of incorporation [,] and
amendments to or restatements of articles of incorporation [and
records for dissolution] is $50 for each record. The Secretary of
State may establish by regulation the fee for filing articles of
incorporation, which must not exceed $50 for each record. If the
Secretary of State establishes the fee by regulation, the fee for
filing articles of incorporation must be in the amount established
by the Secretary of State by regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the fees set
forth in NRS 78.785 apply to this chapter.
Sec. 26. NRS 84.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
84.110 1. Every corporation sole must have a registered
agent in the manner provided in NRS 78.090 and 78.097. The
registered agent shall comply with the provisions of those sections.
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
corporation sole is subject to the provisions of NRS 78.150 to
78.185, inclusive, except that:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 31 –
(a) The fee for filing a list is $50;
(b) The penalty added for default is $50; and
(c) The fee for reinstatement is $100.
3. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee that a corporation sole must pay for filing a list,
the penalty added for default and the fee for reinstatement, which
must not exceed the corresponding amount set forth in subsection
2. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
the fee for filing a list, the penalty added for default or the fee for
reinstatement, the fee for filing a list, the penalty added for default
and the fee for reinstatement must be in the amount established by
the Secretary of State by regulation.
Sec. 27. NRS 84.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
84.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4, the Secretary of State shall reinstate any corporation sole which
has forfeited its right to transact business under the provisions of
this chapter and restore the right to carry on business in this State
and exercise its corporate privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(2) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the archbishop, bishop, president, trustee in trust, president of stake,
president of congregation, overseer, presiding elder, district
superintendent, other presiding officer or member of the clergy of a
church or religious society or denomination, who has been chosen,
elected or appointed in conformity with the constitution, canons,
rites, regulations or discipline of the church or religious society or
denomination, and in whom is vested the legal title to property held
for the purposes, use or benefit of the church or religious society or
denomination; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State the:
(1) Filing fees and penalties set forth in this chapter for each
year or portion thereof during which its charter has been revoked;
and
(2) Fee for reinstatement [set forth in paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of] in the amount required by NRS 84.110.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the corporation to its
former rights, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Immediately issue and deliver to the corporation a certificate
of reinstatement authorizing it to transact business, as if the fees had
been paid when due; and
-
*SB75_R1*

– 32 –
(b) Upon demand, issue to the corporation a certified copy of the
certificate of reinstatement.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation of
its charter occurred only by reason of its failure to pay the fees and
penalties.
4. If a corporate charter has been revoked pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and has remained revoked for 10
consecutive years, the charter must not be reinstated.
5. A reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the
date on which the corporation forfeited its right to transact business
under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the corporation’s
right to transact business as if such right had at all times remained in
full force and effect.
Sec. 28. NRS 86.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.171 1. The name of a limited-liability company formed
under the provisions of this chapter must contain the words
“Limited-Liability Company,” “Limited Liability Company,”
“Limited Company,” or “Limited” or the abbreviations “Ltd.,”
“L.L.C.,” “L.C.,” “LLC” or “LC.” The word “Company” may be
abbreviated as “Co.”
2. The name proposed for a limited-liability company must be
distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of State from the
names of all other artificial persons formed, organized, registered or
qualified pursuant to the provisions of this title that are on file in the
Office of the Secretary of State and all names that are reserved in
the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this
title. If a proposed name is not so distinguishable, the Secretary of
State shall return the articles of organization to the organizer, unless
the written, acknowledged consent of the holder of the name on file
or reserved name to use the same name or the requested similar
name accompanies the articles of organization.
3. For the purposes of this section and NRS 86.176, a proposed
name is not distinguishable from a name on file or reserved name
solely because one or the other contains distinctive lettering, a
distinctive mark, a trademark or a trade name, or any combination
thereof.
4. The name of a limited-liability company whose charter has
been revoked, which has merged and is not the surviving entity or
whose existence has otherwise terminated is available for use by any
other artificial person.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of organization for any limited-liability company if the name of the
limited-liability company contains the word “accountant,”
-
*SB75_R1*

– 33 –
“accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or “auditing” unless the
Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies that the limited-
liability company:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the limited-liability
company is not engaged in the practice of accounting and is not
offering to practice accounting in this State.
6. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of organization or certificate of amendment of articles of
organization of any limited-liability company formed or existing
pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the name of
the limited-liability company contains the word “bank” or “trust”
unless:
(a) It appears from the articles of organization or the certificate
of amendment that the limited-liability company proposes to carry
on business as a banking or trust company, exclusively or in
connection with its business as a bank, savings and loan association,
savings bank or thrift company; and
(b) The articles of organization or certificate of amendment is
first approved by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
7. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of organization or certificate of amendment of articles of
organization of any limited-liability company formed or existing
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if it appears from the
articles or the certificate of amendment that the business to be
carried on by the limited-liability company is subject to supervision
by the Commissioner of Insurance or by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions unless the articles or certificate of amendment
is approved by the Commissioner who will supervise the business of
the limited-liability company.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of organization or
certificate of amendment of articles of organization of any limited-
liability company formed or existing pursuant to the laws of this
State which provides that the name of the limited-liability company
contains the words “engineer,” “engineered,” “engineering,”
“professional engineer,” “registered engineer” or “licensed
engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the limited-liability
company are licensed to practice engineering pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 34 –
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the limited-liability company is exempt from
the prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
9. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of organization or
certificate of amendment of articles of organization of any limited-
liability company formed or existing pursuant to the laws of this
State which provides that the name of the limited-liability company
contains the words “architect,” “architecture,” “registered architect,”
“licensed architect,” “registered interior designer,” “registered
interior design,” “residential designer,” “registered residential
designer,” “licensed residential designer” or “residential design”
unless [the] :
(a) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design certifies that:
[(a)] (1) The principals of the limited-liability company are
holders of a certificate of registration to practice architecture or
residential design or to practice as a registered interior designer, as
applicable, pursuant to the laws of this State; or
[(b)] (2) The limited-liability company is qualified to do
business in this State pursuant to NRS 623.349 [.] ; or
(b) The principals of the limited-liability company present
documentation satisfactory to the Secretary of State showing that:
(1) The principals are holders of a certificate of registration
to practice architecture or residential design or to practice as a
registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
(2) The limited-liability company is qualified to do business
in this State pursuant to NRS 623.349.
10. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
articles of organization or certificate of amendment of articles of
organization of any limited-liability company formed or existing
pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the name of
the limited-liability company contains the words “common-interest
community,” “community association,” “master association,” “unit-
owners’ association” or “homeowners’ association” or if it appears
in the articles of organization or certificate of amendment of articles
of organization that the purpose of the limited-liability company is
to operate as a unit-owners’ association pursuant to chapter 116 or
116B of NRS unless the Administrator of the Real Estate Division
of the Department of Business and Industry certifies that the
limited-liability company has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
-
*SB75_R1*

– 35 –
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations that interpret
the requirements of this section.
Sec. 29. NRS 86.263 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.263 1. A limited-liability company shall, at the time of the
filing of its articles of organization with the Secretary of State, or, if
the limited-liability company has selected an alternative due date
pursuant to subsection 12, on or before that alternative due date, file
with the Secretary of State, on a form furnished by the Secretary of
State, a list that contains:
(a) The name of the limited-liability company;
(b) The file number of the limited-liability company, if known;
(c) The names and titles of all of its managers or, if there is no
manager, all of its managing members;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each manager or
managing member listed, following the name of the manager or
managing member; and
(e) The signature of a manager or managing member of the
limited-liability company, or some other person specifically
authorized by the limited-liability company to sign the list,
certifying that the list is true, complete and accurate.
2. The limited-liability company shall thereafter, on or before
the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of its
organization occurs, or, if, pursuant to subsection 12, the limited-
liability company has selected an alternative due date for filing the
list required by subsection 1, on or before the last day of the month
in which the anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in
each year, file with the Secretary of State, on a form furnished by
the Secretary of State, an annual list containing all of the
information required in subsection 1.
3. Each list required by subsections 1 and 2 must be
accompanied by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The limited-liability company has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The limited-liability company acknowledges that pursuant to
NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false
or forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(c) None of the managers or managing members identified in the
list has been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of
concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising the
power or authority of a manager or managing member in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 36 –
4. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, the limited-liability
company shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 2, the limited-
liability company shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid for filing the initial list required by
subsection 1 and each annual list required by subsection 2, which
must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the initial list and
each annual list, the limited-liability company shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary
of State by regulation.
5. If a limited-liability company files an amended list of
managers and managing members with the Secretary of State within
60 days after the date on which the initial list required by subsection
1 is filed, the limited-liability company or the resigning manager or
managing member is not required to pay a fee for filing the
amended list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if a manager
or managing member of a limited-liability company resigns and the
resignation is not reflected on the annual or amended list of
managers and managing members, the limited-liability company or
the resigning manager or managing member shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
7. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each list required by subsection 2, provide to each limited-
liability company which is required to comply with the provisions of
this section, and which has not become delinquent, a notice of the
fee due under subsection 4 and a reminder to file the list required by
subsection 2. Failure of any company to receive a notice does not
excuse it from the penalty imposed by law.
8. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 or 2 is defective or the fee required by subsection 4 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
9. An annual list for a limited-liability company not in default
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year.
10. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list
required by subsection 1 or 2 which identifies a manager or
managing member with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a manager or managing member in furtherance of any unlawful
conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 37 –
11. For the purposes of this section, a member is not deemed to
exercise actual control of the daily operations of a limited-liability
company based solely on the fact that the member has voting control
of the limited-liability company.
12. The Secretary of State may allow a limited-liability
company to select an alternative due date for filing the list required
by subsection 1.
13. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 12.
Sec. 30. NRS 86.272 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.272 1. Each limited-liability company which is required to
make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 86.263 and 86.264
and which refuses or neglects to do so within the time provided is in
default.
2. Upon notification from the Administrator of the Real Estate
Division of the Department of Business and Industry that a limited-
liability company which is a unit-owners’ association as defined in
NRS 116.011 or 116B.030 has failed to register pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625 or failed to pay the fees pursuant to NRS
116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State shall deem the
limited-liability company to be in default. If, after the limited-
liability company is deemed to be in default, the Administrator
notifies the Secretary of State that the limited-liability company has
registered pursuant to NRS 116.31158 or 116B.625 and paid the
fees pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State
shall reinstate the limited-liability company if the limited-liability
company complies with the requirements for reinstatement as
provided in this section and NRS 86.276.
3. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the penalty for default, which must not exceed $75. If
the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of such
a penalty for default, there must be added to the amount of the fee
a penalty in the amount established by the Secretary of State by
regulation. The fee and penalty must be collected as provided in
this chapter.
Sec. 31. NRS 86.276 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.276 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 86.246, the Secretary of State shall reinstate any limited-
liability company which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to
transact business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and shall
restore to the company its right to carry on business in this State,
and to exercise its privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 38 –
(1) The list required by NRS 86.263;
(2) The statement required by NRS 86.264, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected manager or managers of the limited-liability
company or, if there are no managers, its managing members; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 86.263 and
86.272 for each year or portion thereof during which it failed to file
in a timely manner each required annual list;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 86.264, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the limited-
liability company must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the limited-liability
company, the Secretary of State shall issue to the company a
certificate of reinstatement if the limited-liability company:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 86.561.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation of
the charter occurred only by reason of failure to pay the fees and
penalties.
4. If a company’s charter has been revoked pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and has remained revoked for a period of
5 consecutive years, the charter must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 86.278, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the company forfeited its right to transact business under the
provisions of this chapter and reinstates the company’s right to
transact business as if such right had at all times remained in full
force and effect.
Sec. 31.5. NRS 86.4895 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.4895 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a limited-
liability company whose charter has been revoked to dissolve
without paying additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for
-
*SB75_R1*

– 39 –
filing articles of dissolution required by NRS 86.561,] if the limited-
liability company provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of
State that the limited-liability company did not transact business in
this State or as a limited-liability company organized pursuant to the
laws of this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its charter was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its charter was
revoked and the limited-liability company paid the fees and
penalties for the portion of that period in which the limited-liability
company transacted business in this State or as a limited-liability
company organized pursuant to the laws of this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 32. NRS 86.5461 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.5461 1. Each foreign limited-liability company doing
business in this State shall, at the time of the filing of its application
for registration as a foreign limited-liability company with the
Secretary of State, or, if the foreign limited-liability company has
selected an alternative due date pursuant to subsection 11, on or
before that alternative due date, and annually thereafter on or before
the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of its
qualification to do business in this State occurs in each year, or, if
applicable, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, file
with the Secretary of State a list on a form furnished by the
Secretary of State that contains:
(a) The name of the foreign limited-liability company;
(b) The file number of the foreign limited-liability company, if
known;
(c) The names and titles of all its managers or, if there is no
manager, all its managing members;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each manager or
managing member listed pursuant to paragraph (c); and
(e) The signature of a manager or managing member of the
foreign limited-liability company, or some other person specifically
authorized by the foreign limited-liability company to sign the list,
certifying that the list is true, complete and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to this section must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The foreign limited-liability company has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The foreign limited-liability company acknowledges that
pursuant to NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly
offer any false or forged instrument for filing with the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
-
*SB75_R1*

– 40 –
(c) None of the managers or managing members identified in the
list has been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of
concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising the
power or authority of a manager or managing member in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by this section, the foreign limited-
liability company shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by this section, the foreign limited-
liability company shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid for filing the initial list and each
annual list required by this section, which must not exceed $150.
If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
such a fee, upon filing the initial list and each annual list, the
foreign limited-liability company shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary of State by
regulation.
4. If a foreign limited-liability company files an amended list
of managers and managing members with the Secretary of State
within 60 days after the date on which the initial list required by this
section is filed, the foreign limited-liability company or the
resigning manager or managing member is not required to pay a fee
for filing the amended list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a manager
or managing member of a foreign limited-liability company resigns
and the resignation is not reflected on the annual or amended list of
managers and managing members, the foreign limited-liability
company or the resigning manager or managing member shall pay
to the Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
6. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by this section, provide to each
foreign limited-liability company which is required to comply with
the provisions of NRS 86.5461 to 86.5468, inclusive, and which has
not become delinquent, a notice of the fee due pursuant to
subsection 3 and a reminder to file the list required pursuant
to subsection 1. Failure of any foreign limited-liability company to
receive a notice does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by the
provisions of NRS 86.5461 to 86.5468, inclusive.
7. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
8. An annual list for a foreign limited-liability company not in
default which is received by the Secretary of State more than 90
-
*SB75_R1*

– 41 –
days before its due date shall be deemed an amended list for the
previous year and does not satisfy the requirements of this section
for the year to which the due date is applicable.
9. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list required
by this section which identifies a manager or managing member
with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or
persons exercising the power or authority of a manager or managing
members in furtherance of any unlawful conduct is subject to the
penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
10. For the purposes of this section, a member is not deemed to
exercise actual control of the daily operations of a foreign limited-
liability company based solely on the fact that the member has
voting control of the foreign limited-liability company.
11. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign limited-liability
company to select an alternative due date for filing the initial list
required by this section.
12. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 11.
Sec. 33. NRS 86.5465 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.5465 1. Each foreign limited-liability company which is
required to make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 86.5461
to 86.5468, inclusive, and which refuses or neglects to do so within
the time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75, and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date
of the foreign limited-liability company occurs, the defaulting
foreign limited-liability company by reason of its default forfeits its
right to transact any business within this State. The Secretary of
State may establish by regulation the amount of the penalty for
default, which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a penalty for default,
there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty in the
amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation. The fee
and penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 34. NRS 86.5467 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.5467 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 86.54615, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a foreign
limited-liability company which has forfeited or which forfeits its
right to transact business under the provisions of this chapter and
shall restore to the foreign limited-liability company its right to
transact business in this State, and to exercise its privileges and
immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 42 –
(1) The list required by NRS 86.5461;
(2) The statement required by NRS 86.5462, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected manager or managers of the foreign limited-
liability company or, if there are no managers, its managing
members; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 86.5461 and
86.5465 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 86.5462, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the foreign
limited-liability company must pay to the Secretary of State a fee
for reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of
State by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the foreign limited-
liability company, the Secretary of State shall issue to the foreign
limited-liability company a certificate of reinstatement if the foreign
limited-liability company:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 86.561.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a foreign limited-liability company to transact
business in this State has been forfeited pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter and has remained forfeited for a period of 5 consecutive
years, the right must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 86.5468, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the foreign limited-liability company forfeited its right to
transact business under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates
the foreign limited-liability company’s right to transact business as
if such right had at all times remained in full force and effect.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 43 –
Sec. 34.5. NRS 86.5469 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.5469 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a foreign
limited-liability company whose right to transact business in this
State has been revoked to cancel its registration without paying
additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for filing a
certificate of cancellation required by NRS 86.561,] if the foreign
limited-liability company provides evidence satisfactory to the
Secretary of State that the foreign limited-liability company did not
transact business in this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its right to transact
business in this State was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its right to transact
business in this State was revoked and the foreign limited-liability
company paid the fees and penalties for the portion of that period in
which the foreign limited-liability company transacted business in
this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 35. NRS 86.561 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.561 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
4, the Secretary of State shall charge and collect for:
(a) Filing the original articles of organization, or for registration
of a foreign company, $75;
(b) Amending or restating the articles of organization, amending
the registration of a foreign company or filing a certificate of
correction, $175;
(c) [Filing the articles of dissolution of a domestic or foreign
company, $100;
(d)] Certifying a copy of articles of organization or an
amendment to the articles, $30;
[(e)] (d) Certifying an authorized printed copy of this chapter,
$30;
[(f)] (e) Reserving a name for a limited-liability company, $25;
[(g) Filing a certificate of cancellation, $100;
(h)] (f) Signing, filing or certifying any other record, $50; and
[(i)] (g) Copies provided by the Office of the Secretary of State,
$2 per page.
2. The Secretary of State shall charge and collect, at the time of
any service of process on the Secretary of State as agent for service
of process of a limited-liability company, $100 which may be
recovered as taxable costs by the party to the action causing the
service to be made if the party prevails in the action.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the fees set
forth in NRS 78.785 apply to this chapter.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 44 –
4. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the fee for filing the original articles of organization or
for registration of a foreign company, which must not exceed $75.
If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
such a fee, the Secretary of State shall charge and collect a fee in
the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation for
filing the original articles of organization or for registration of a
foreign company.
Sec. 36. NRS 86.566 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.566 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 37. NRS 87.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.440 1. To become a registered limited-liability
partnership, a partnership shall file with the Secretary of State a
certificate of registration stating each of the following:
(a) The name of the partnership.
(b) The street address of its principal office.
(c) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310.
(d) The name and business address of each managing partner.
(e) That the partnership thereafter will be a registered limited-
liability partnership.
(f) Any other information that the partnership wishes to include.
2. The certificate of registration must be signed by a majority
in interest of the partners or by one or more partners authorized to
sign such a certificate.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
certificate of registration must be accompanied by a fee of $75. The
Secretary of State may establish by regulation the fee that must
accompany a certificate of registration, which must not exceed
$75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation such a fee,
the certificate of registration must be accompanied by a fee in the
amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
4. The Secretary of State shall register as a registered limited-
liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed
certificate of registration with the required fee. A person shall not
register a registered limited-liability partnership for any illegal
-
*SB75_R1*

– 45 –
purpose or with the fraudulent intent to conceal any business
activity, or lack thereof, from another person or a governmental
agency.
5. The registration of a registered limited-liability partnership
is effective at the time of the filing of the certificate of registration.
Sec. 38. NRS 87.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.450 1. The name proposed for a registered limited-
liability partnership must contain the words “Limited-Liability
Partnership” or “Registered Limited-Liability Partnership” or the
abbreviation “L.L.P.” or “LLP” as the last words or letters of the
name and must be distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of
State from the names of all other artificial persons formed,
organized, registered or qualified pursuant to the provisions of this
title that are on file in the Office of the Secretary of State and all
names that are reserved in the Office of the Secretary of State
pursuant to the provisions of this title. If the name of the registered
limited-liability partnership on a certificate of registration of
limited-liability partnership submitted to the Secretary of State is not
distinguishable from a name on file or reserved name, the Secretary
of State shall return the certificate to the person who signed it unless
the written, acknowledged consent of the holder of the name on file
or reserved name to use the name accompanies the certificate.
2. For the purposes of this section, a proposed name is not
distinguishable from a name on file or reserved name solely because
one or the other contains distinctive lettering, a distinctive mark, a
trademark or a trade name, or any combination thereof.
3. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of registration or certificate of amendment of a certificate
of registration of any registered limited-liability partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the registered limited-liability partnership contains the
word “accountant,” “accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or
“auditing” unless the Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies
that the registered limited-liability partnership:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the registered limited-
liability partnership is not engaged in the practice of accounting and
is not offering to practice accounting in this State.
4. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of registration or certificate of amendment of a certificate
of registration of any registered limited-liability partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
-
*SB75_R1*

– 46 –
name of the registered limited-liability partnership contains the
word “bank” or “trust” unless:
(a) It appears from the certificate of registration or the certificate
of amendment that the registered limited-liability partnership
proposes to carry on business as a banking or trust company,
exclusively or in connection with its business as a bank, savings and
loan association, savings bank or thrift company; and
(b) The certificate of registration or certificate of amendment is
first approved by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of registration or certificate of amendment of a certificate
of registration of any registered limited-liability partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if it appears
from the certificate of registration or the certificate of amendment
that the business to be carried on by the registered limited-liability
partnership is subject to supervision by the Commissioner of
Insurance or by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, unless
the certificate of registration or certificate of amendment is
approved by the Commissioner who will supervise the business of
the registered limited-liability partnership.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any certificate of registration or
certificate of amendment of a certificate of registration of any
registered limited-liability partnership formed or existing pursuant
to the laws of this State which provides that the name of the
registered limited-liability partnership contains the words
“engineer,” “engineered,” “engineering,” “professional engineer,”
“registered engineer” or “licensed engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the registered limited-
liability partnership are licensed to practice engineering pursuant to
the laws of this State; or
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the registered limited-liability partnership is
exempt from the prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any certificate of registration or
certificate of amendment of a certificate of registration of any
registered limited-liability partnership formed or existing pursuant
to the laws of this State which provides that the name of the
registered limited-liability partnership contains the words
“architect,” “architecture,” “registered architect,” “licensed
architect,” “registered interior designer,” “registered interior
design,” “residential designer,” “registered residential designer,”
“licensed residential designer” or “residential design” unless [the] :
-
*SB75_R1*

– 47 –
(a) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design certifies that:
[(a)] (1) The principals of the registered limited-liability
partnership are holders of a certificate of registration to practice
architecture or residential design or to practice as a registered
interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of this State; or
[(b)] (2) The registered limited-liability partnership is qualified
to do business in this State pursuant to NRS 623.349 [.] ; or
(b) The principals of the registered limited-liability partnership
present documentation satisfactory to the Secretary of State
showing that:
(1) The principals are holders of a certificate of registration
to practice architecture or residential design or to practice as a
registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
(2) The registered limited-liability partnership is qualified
to do business in this State pursuant to NRS 623.349.
8. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of registration or certificate of amendment of a certificate
of registration of any registered limited-liability partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the registered limited-liability partnership contains the
words “common-interest community,” “community association,”
“master association,” “unit-owners’ association” or “homeowners’
association” or if it appears in the certificate of registration or
certificate of amendment that the purpose of the registered limited-
liability partnership is to operate as a unit-owners’ association
pursuant to chapter 116 or 116B of NRS unless the Administrator of
the Real Estate Division of the Department of Business and Industry
certifies that the registered limited-liability partnership has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
9. The name of a registered limited-liability partnership whose
right to transact business has been forfeited, which has merged and
is not the surviving entity or whose existence has otherwise
terminated is available for use by any other artificial person.
10. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations that interpret
the requirements of this section.
Sec. 38.5. NRS 87.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.470 The registration of a registered limited-liability
partnership is effective until:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 48 –
1. Its certificate of registration is revoked pursuant to NRS
87.520; or
2. The registered limited-liability partnership files with the
Secretary of State a notice of withdrawal signed by a managing
partner. [The notice must be accompanied by a fee of $100.]
Sec. 39. NRS 87.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.510 1. A registered limited-liability partnership shall, at
the time of the filing of its certificate of registration with the
Secretary of State, or, if the registered limited-liability partnership
has selected an alternative due date pursuant to subsection 10, on or
before that alternative due date, and annually thereafter on or before
the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of the filing
of its certificate of registration with the Secretary of State occurs, or,
if applicable, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, file
with the Secretary of State, on a form furnished by the Secretary of
State, a list that contains:
(a) The name of the registered limited-liability partnership;
(b) The file number of the registered limited-liability
partnership, if known;
(c) The names of all of its managing partners;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each managing
partner; and
(e) The signature of a managing partner of the registered
limited-liability partnership, or some other person specifically
authorized by the registered limited-liability partnership to sign the
list, certifying that the list is true, complete and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to subsection 1 must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The registered limited-liability partnership has complied
with the provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The registered limited-liability partnership acknowledges
that pursuant to NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to
knowingly offer any false or forged instrument for filing in the
Office of the Secretary of State; and
(c) None of the managing partners identified in the list has been
identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a managing partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, the registered
limited-liability partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee
of $150.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 49 –
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, the registered
limited-liability partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee
of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid for filing the initial list and each
annual list required by subsection 1, which must not exceed $150.
If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
such a fee, upon filing the initial list and each annual list, the
registered limited-liability partnership shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary of State by
regulation.
4. If a registered limited-liability partnership files an amended
list of managing partners with the Secretary of State within 60 days
after the date on which the initial list required by subsection 1 is
filed, the registered limited-liability partnership or the resigning
managing partner is not required to pay a fee for filing the amended
list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a managing
partner of a registered limited-liability partnership resigns and the
resignation is not reflected on the annual or amended list of
managing partners, the registered limited-liability partnership or the
resigning managing partner shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee
of $75 to file the resignation.
6. The Secretary of State shall, at least 90 days before the last
day for filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to
the registered limited-liability partnership a notice of the fee due
pursuant to subsection 3 and a reminder to file the annual list
required by subsection 1. The failure of any registered limited-
liability partnership to receive a notice does not excuse it from
complying with the provisions of this section.
7. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective, or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
8. An annual list that is filed by a registered limited-liability
partnership which is not in default more than 90 days before it is due
shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year and does not
satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to which the
due date is applicable.
9. A person who files with the Secretary of State an initial list
or annual list required by subsection 1 which identifies a managing
partner with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any
person or persons exercising the power or authority of a managing
partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct is subject to the
penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 50 –
10. The Secretary of State may allow a registered limited-
liability partnership to select an alternative due date for filing the
initial list required by subsection 1.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 10.
Sec. 40. NRS 87.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.520 1. A registered limited-liability partnership that fails
to comply with the provisions of NRS 87.510 is in default.
2. Upon notification from the Administrator of the Real Estate
Division of the Department of Business and Industry that a
registered limited-liability partnership which is a unit-owners’
association as defined in NRS 116.011 or 116B.030 has failed to
register pursuant to NRS 116.31158 or 116B.625 or failed to pay the
fees pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State
shall deem the registered limited-liability partnership to be in
default. If, after the registered limited-liability partnership is deemed
to be in default, the Administrator notifies the Secretary of State that
the registered limited-liability partnership has registered pursuant to
NRS 116.31158 or 116B.625 and paid the fees pursuant to NRS
116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State shall reinstate the
registered limited-liability partnership if the registered limited-
liability partnership complies with the requirements for
reinstatement as provided in this section and NRS 87.530.
3. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any
registered limited-liability partnership that is in default pursuant to
this section must, in addition to the fee required to be paid pursuant
to NRS 87.510, pay a penalty of $75. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the penalty that must be paid
by a registered limited-liability partnership that is in default,
which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the penalty for default, a registered limited-liability
partnership that is in default must pay a penalty in the amount
established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
4. The Secretary of State shall provide written notice to the
registered agent of any registered limited-liability partnership that is
in default. The written notice:
(a) Must include the amount of any payment that is due from the
registered limited-liability partnership.
(b) At the request of the registered agent, may be provided
electronically.
5. If a registered limited-liability partnership fails to pay the
amount that is due, the certificate of registration of the registered
limited-liability partnership shall be deemed revoked immediately
after the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of the
filing of the certificate of registration occurs, and the Secretary of
-
*SB75_R1*

– 51 –
State shall notify the registered limited-liability partnership, by
providing written notice to its registered agent or, if the registered
limited-liability partnership does not have a registered agent, to a
managing partner, that its certificate of registration is revoked. The
written notice:
(a) Must include the amount of any fees and penalties incurred
that are due.
(b) At the request of the registered agent or managing partner,
may be provided electronically.
Sec. 41. NRS 87.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.530 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and
NRS 87.515, the Secretary of State shall reinstate the certificate of
registration of a registered limited-liability partnership that is
revoked pursuant to NRS 87.520 if the registered limited-liability
partnership:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The information required by NRS 87.510;
(2) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected managing partners of the registered limited-
liability partnership.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The fee required to be paid pursuant to NRS 87.510;
(2) Any penalty required to be paid pursuant to NRS 87.520;
and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a reinstatement fee of $300. The Secretary of State may establish
by regulation the amount of the reinstatement fee, which must not
exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of the reinstatement fee, the registered limited-liability
partnership must pay to the Secretary of State a reinstatement fee
in the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the registered limited-
liability partnership, the Secretary of State shall issue to the
registered limited-liability partnership a certificate of reinstatement
if the registered limited-liability partnership:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 87.550.
3. The Secretary of State shall not reinstate the certificate of
registration of a registered limited-liability partnership if the
certificate was revoked pursuant to the provisions of this chapter at
least 5 years before the date of the proposed reinstatement.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 52 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 87.455, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the registered limited-liability partnership’s certificate of
registration was revoked and reinstates the registered limited-
liability’s certificate of registration as if such certificate had at all
times remained in full force and effect.
Sec. 41.5. NRS 87.533 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.533 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a registered
limited-liability partnership whose certificate of registration has
been revoked to dissolve without paying additional fees and
penalties [, other than the fee for filing a notice of withdrawal
required by NRS 87.470,] if the registered limited-liability
partnership provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of State
that the registered limited-liability partnership did not transact
business in this State or as a registered limited-liability partnership
organized pursuant to the laws of this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its certificate of
registration was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its certificate of
registration was revoked and the registered limited-liability
partnership paid the fees and penalties for the portion of that period
in which the registered limited-liability partnership transacted
business in this State or as a registered limited-liability partnership
organized pursuant to the laws of this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 42. NRS 87.541 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.541 1. Each foreign registered limited-liability partnership
doing business in this State shall, at the time of the filing of its
application for registration as a foreign registered limited-liability
partnership with the Secretary of State, or, if the foreign registered
limited-liability partnership has selected an alternative due date
pursuant to subsection 10, on or before that alternative due date, and
annually thereafter on or before the last day of the month in which
the anniversary date of its qualification to do business in this State
occurs in each year, or, if applicable, on or before the last day of the
month in which the anniversary date of the alternative due date
occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of State a list, on a form
furnished by the Secretary of State, that contains:
(a) The name of the foreign registered limited-liability
partnership;
(b) The file number of the foreign registered limited-liability
partnership, if known;
(c) The names of all its managing partners;
-
*SB75_R1*

– 53 –
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each managing
partner; and
(e) The signature of a managing partner of the foreign registered
limited-liability partnership, or some other person specifically
authorized by the foreign registered limited-liability partnership to
sign the list, certifying that the list is true, complete and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to this section must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The foreign registered limited-liability partnership has
complied with the provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The foreign registered limited-liability partnership
acknowledges that pursuant to NRS 239.330, it is a category C
felony to knowingly offer any false or forged instrument for filing in
the Office of the Secretary of State; and
(c) None of the managing partners identified in the list has been
identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a managing partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by this section, the foreign registered
limited-liability partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee
of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by this section, the foreign
registered limited-liability partnership shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid for filing the initial list and each
annual list required by this section, which must not exceed $150.
If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
such a fee, upon filing the initial list and each annual list, the
foreign registered limited-liability partnership shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary
of State by regulation.
4. If a foreign registered limited-liability partnership files an
amended list of managing partners with the Secretary of State within
60 days after the date on which the initial list required by this
section is filed, the foreign registered limited-liability partnership or
the resigning managing partner is not required to pay a fee for filing
the amended list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a managing
partner of a foreign registered limited-liability partnership resigns
and the resignation is not reflected on the annual or amended list of
managing partners, the foreign registered limited-liability
-
*SB75_R1*

– 54 –
partnership or the managing partner shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
6. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
foreign registered limited-liability partnership which is required to
comply with the provisions of NRS 87.541 to 87.5443, inclusive,
and which has not become delinquent, a notice of the fee due
pursuant to subsection 3 and a reminder to file the list required
pursuant to subsection 1. Failure of any foreign registered limited-
liability partnership to receive a notice does not excuse it from the
penalty imposed by the provisions of NRS 87.541 to 87.5443,
inclusive.
7. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
8. An annual list for a foreign registered limited-liability
partnership not in default which is received by the Secretary of State
more than 90 days before its due date shall be deemed an amended
list for the previous year and does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection 1 for the year to which the due date is applicable.
9. A person who files with the Secretary of State an initial list
or annual list required by subsection 1 which identifies a managing
partner with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any
person or persons exercising the power and authority of a managing
partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct is subject to the
penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
10. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign registered
limited-liability partnership to select an alternative due date for
filing the initial list required by this section.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 10.
Sec. 43. NRS 87.5425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.5425 1. Each foreign registered limited-liability
partnership which is required to make a filing and pay the fee
prescribed in NRS 87.541 to 87.5443, inclusive, and which refuses
or neglects to do so within the time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75, and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date
of the foreign registered limited-liability partnership occurs, the
defaulting foreign registered limited-liability partnership by reason
of its default forfeits its right to transact any business within this
State. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the penalty that must be paid by a foreign registered
-
*SB75_R1*

– 55 –
limited-liability partnership that is in default, which must not
exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
penalty for default, a foreign registered limited-liability
partnership that is in default must pay a penalty in the amount
established by the Secretary of State by regulation. The fee and
penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 44. NRS 87.5435 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87.5435 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 87.5413, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a foreign
registered limited-liability partnership which has forfeited or which
forfeits its right to transact business under the provisions of this
chapter and shall restore to the foreign registered limited-liability
partnership its right to transact business in this State, and to exercise
its privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required by NRS 87.541;
(2) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected managing partners of the foreign registered
limited-liability partnership; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 87.541 and
87.5425 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited; and
(2) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the foreign
registered limited-liability partnership must pay to the Secretary of
State a fee for reinstatement in the amount established by the
Secretary of State by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the foreign registered
limited-liability partnership, the Secretary of State shall issue to the
foreign registered limited-liability partnership a certificate of
reinstatement if the foreign registered limited-liability partnership:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 87.550.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
-
*SB75_R1*

– 56 –
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a foreign registered limited-liability
partnership to transact business in this State has been forfeited
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and has remained forfeited
for a period of 5 consecutive years, the right to transact business
must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 87.544, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the foreign registered limited-liability partnership forfeited its
right to transact business under the provisions of this chapter and
reinstates the foreign registered limited-liability partnership’s right
to transact business as if such right had at all times remained in full
force and effect.
Sec. 45. NRS 87A.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.175 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 87A.635,
the name proposed for a limited partnership as set forth in its
certificate of limited partnership:
(a) Must contain the words “Limited Partnership,” or the
abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.”;
(b) May contain the name of any partner; and
(c) Must be distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of
State from the names of all other artificial persons formed,
organized, registered or qualified pursuant to the provisions of this
title that are on file in the Office of the Secretary of State and all
names that are reserved in the Office of the Secretary of State
pursuant to the provisions of this title. If the name on the certificate
of limited partnership submitted to the Secretary of State is not
distinguishable from any name on file or reserved name, the
Secretary of State shall return the certificate to the filer, unless
the written, acknowledged consent to the use of the same or the
requested similar name of the holder of the name on file or reserved
name accompanies the certificate of limited partnership.
2. For the purposes of this section, a proposed name is not
distinguished from a name on file or reserved name solely because
one or the other contains distinctive lettering, a distinctive mark, a
trademark or a trade name, or any combination thereof.
3. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the limited partnership contains the word “accountant,”
“accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or “auditing” unless the
Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies that the limited
partnership:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 57 –
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the limited partnership is
not engaged in the practice of accounting and is not offering to
practice accounting in this State.
4. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the limited partnership contains the word “bank” or “trust”
unless:
(a) It appears from the certificate of limited partnership that the
limited partnership proposes to carry on business as a banking or
trust company, exclusively or in connection with its business as a
bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or thrift company;
and
(b) The certificate of limited partnership is first approved by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if it appears
from the certificate of limited partnership that the business to be
carried on by the limited partnership is subject to supervision by the
Commissioner of Insurance or by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions, unless the certificate of limited partnership is approved
by the Commissioner who will supervise the business of the limited
partnership.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any certificate of limited
partnership for any limited partnership formed or existing pursuant
to the laws of this State which provides that the name of the limited
partnership contains the words “engineer,” “engineered,”
“engineering,” “professional engineer,” “registered engineer” or
“licensed engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the limited partnership are
licensed to practice engineering pursuant to the laws of this State; or
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the limited partnership is exempt from the
prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any certificate of limited
partnership for any limited partnership formed or existing pursuant
to the laws of this State which provides that the name of the limited
partnership contains the words “architect,” “architecture,”
-
*SB75_R1*

– 58 –
“registered architect,” “licensed architect,” “registered interior
designer,” “registered interior design,” “residential designer,”
“registered residential designer,” “licensed residential designer” or
“residential design” unless [the] :
(a) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design certifies that:
[(a)] (1) The principals of the limited partnership are holders of
a certificate of registration to practice architecture or residential
design or to practice as a registered interior designer, as applicable,
pursuant to the laws of this State; or
[(b)] (2) The limited partnership is qualified to do business in
this State pursuant to NRS 623.349 [.] ; or
(b) The principals of the limited partnership present
documentation satisfactory to the Secretary of State showing that:
(1) The principals are holders of a certificate of registration
to practice architecture or residential design or to practice as a
registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
(2) The limited partnership is qualified to do business in
this State pursuant to NRS 623.349.
8. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the limited partnership contains the words “common-
interest community,” “community association,” “master
association,” “unit-owners’ association” or “homeowners’
association” or if it appears in the certificate of limited partnership
that the purpose of the limited partnership is to operate as a unit-
owners’ association pursuant to chapter 116 or 116B of NRS unless
the Administrator of the Real Estate Division of the Department of
Business and Industry certifies that the limited partnership has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
9. The name of a limited partnership whose right to transact
business has been forfeited, which has merged and is not the
surviving entity or whose existence has otherwise terminated is
available for use by any other artificial person.
10. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations that interpret
the requirements of this section.
Sec. 46. NRS 87A.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.270 [No]
-
*SB75_R1*

– 59 –
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 47. NRS 87A.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.290 1. A limited partnership shall, at the time of the
filing of its certificate of limited partnership with the Secretary of
State, or, if the limited partnership has selected an alternative due
date pursuant to subsection 12, on or before that alternative due
date, and annually thereafter on or before the last day of the month
in which the anniversary date of the filing of its certificate of limited
partnership occurs, or, if applicable, on or before the last day of the
month in which the anniversary date of the alternative due date
occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of State, on a form
furnished by the Secretary of State, a list that contains:
(a) The name of the limited partnership;
(b) The file number of the limited partnership, if known;
(c) The names of all of its general partners;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each general
partner; and
(e) The signature of a general partner of the limited partnership,
or some other person specifically authorized by the limited
partnership to sign the list, certifying that the list is true, complete
and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to subsection 1 must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The limited partnership has complied with the provisions of
chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The limited partnership acknowledges that pursuant to NRS
239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false or
forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State;
and
(c) None of the general partners identified in the list has been
identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a general partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 4, a limited partnership shall, upon filing:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 60 –
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, pay to the Secretary
of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid by a limited partnership for filing
the initial list and each annual list required by subsection 1, which
must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the initial list and
each annual list, the limited partnership shall pay to the Secretary
of State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
4. [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
registered limited-liability limited partnership shall, upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, pay to the Secretary
of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid by a registered limited-liability
limited partnership for filing the initial list and each annual list
required by subsection 1, which must not exceed $150. If the
Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of such a
fee, upon filing the initial list and each annual list, the registered
limited-liability limited partnership shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary of State by
regulation.
5. If a limited partnership files an amended list of general
partners with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the date on
which the initial list required by subsection 1 is filed, the limited
partnership or the resigning general partner is not required to pay a
fee for filing the amended list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if a general
partner of a limited partnership resigns and the resignation is not
reflected on the annual or amended list of general partners, the
limited partnership or the resigning general partner shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
7. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
limited partnership which is required to comply with the provisions
of this section, and which has not become delinquent, a notice of the
fee due pursuant to the provisions of subsection 3 or 4, as
appropriate, and a reminder to file the annual list required pursuant
to subsection 1. Failure of any limited partnership to receive a notice
does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by NRS 87A.300.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 61 –
8. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 or 4, as
appropriate, is not paid, the Secretary of State may return the list for
correction or payment.
9. An annual list for a limited partnership not in default that is
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year and does
not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to which the
due date is applicable.
10. A filing made pursuant to this section does not satisfy the
provisions of NRS 87A.240 and may not be substituted for filings
submitted pursuant to NRS 87A.240.
11. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list
required by subsection 1 which identifies a general partner with the
fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or persons
exercising the power or authority of a general partner in furtherance
of any unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in
NRS 225.084.
12. The Secretary of State may allow a limited partnership to
select an alternative due date for filing the initial list required by
subsection 1.
13. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 12.
Sec. 48. NRS 87A.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.300 1. If a limited partnership has filed the list in
compliance with NRS 87A.290 and has paid the appropriate fee for
the filing, the cancelled check or other proof of payment received by
the limited partnership constitutes a certificate authorizing it to
transact its business within this State until the anniversary date of
the filing of its certificate of limited partnership in the next
succeeding calendar year.
2. Each limited partnership which is required to make a filing
and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 87A.290 and 87A.295 and which
refuses or neglects to do so within the time provided is in default.
3. Upon notification from the Administrator of the Real Estate
Division of the Department of Business and Industry that a limited
partnership which is a unit-owners’ association as defined in NRS
116.011 has failed to register pursuant to NRS 116.31158 or failed
to pay the fees pursuant to NRS 116.31155, the Secretary of State
shall deem the limited partnership to be in default. If, after the
limited partnership is deemed to be in default, the Administrator
notifies the Secretary of State that the limited partnership has
registered pursuant to NRS 116.31158 and paid the fees pursuant to
NRS 116.31155, the Secretary of State shall reinstate the limited
-
*SB75_R1*

– 62 –
partnership if the limited partnership complies with the requirements
for reinstatement as provided in this section and NRS 87A.310.
4. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75, and unless the filings are made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the first day of the first anniversary of the month
following the month in which filing was required, the defaulting
limited partnership, by reason of its default, forfeits its right to
transact any business within this State. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the penalty that must be paid
for default, which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the penalty for default, the penalty for
default must be in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
Sec. 49. NRS 87A.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.310 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3
and 4 and NRS 87A.200, the Secretary of State shall reinstate any
limited partnership which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to
transact business under the provisions of this chapter and restore to
the limited partnership its right to carry on business in this State,
and to exercise its privileges and immunities if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required pursuant to NRS 87A.290;
(2) The statement required by NRS 87A.295, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected general partners of the limited partnership; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 87A.290 and
87A.300 for each year or portion thereof during which the certificate
has been revoked;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 87A.295, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the limited
partnership must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 63 –
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the limited
partnership, the Secretary of State shall issue to the limited
partnership a certificate of reinstatement if the limited partnership:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 87A.315.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation
occurred only by reason of failure to pay the fees and penalties.
4. If a limited partnership’s certificate has been revoked
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and has remained revoked
for a period of 5 years, the certificate must not be reinstated.
5. If a limited partnership’s certificate is reinstated pursuant to
this section, the reinstatement relates back to and takes effect on the
effective date of the revocation, and the limited partnership’s status
as a limited partnership continues as if the revocation had never
occurred.
Sec. 50. NRS 87A.315 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.315 The Secretary of State, for services relating to the
official duties of the Secretary of State and the records of the Office
of the Secretary of State, shall charge and collect the following fees:
1. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
filing a certificate of limited partnership, or for registering a foreign
limited partnership, $75. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the fee for filing a certificate of limited partnership or
for registering a foreign limited partnership, which must not
exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation such
a fee, the Secretary of State shall charge and collect the fee
established by the Secretary of State by regulation for filing a
certificate of limited partnership or for registering a foreign
limited partnership.
2. For filing a certificate of registration of limited-liability
limited partnership, or for registering a foreign registered limited-
liability limited partnership, $100.
3. For filing a certificate of amendment of limited partnership
or restated certificate of limited partnership, $175.
4. For certifying a copy of a certificate of limited partnership,
an amendment to the certificate, or a certificate as amended, $30 per
certification.
5. For certifying an authorized printed copy of the limited
partnership law, $30.
6. For reserving a limited partnership name, or for signing,
filing or certifying any other record, $25.
7. For copies provided by the Office of the Secretary of State,
$2 per page.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 64 –
[8. For filing a certificate of cancellation of a limited
partnership or a certificate of cancellation of the registration of a
foreign limited partnership, $100.]
 Except as otherwise provided in this section, the fees set forth in
NRS 78.785 apply to this chapter.
Sec. 50.5. NRS 87A.488 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
87A.488 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a limited
partnership whose certificate of limited partnership has been
revoked to dissolve without paying additional fees and penalties [,
other than the fee for filing a certificate of cancellation required by
NRS 87A.315,] if the limited partnership provides evidence
satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the limited partnership did
not transact business in this State or as a limited partnership
organized pursuant to the laws of this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its certificate of limited
partnership was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its certificate of
limited partnership was revoked and the limited partnership paid the
fees and penalties for the portion of that period in which the limited
partnership transacted business in this State or as a limited
partnership organized pursuant to the laws of this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 51. NRS 87A.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.560 1. Each foreign limited partnership doing business
in this State shall, at the time of the filing of its application for
registration as a foreign limited partnership with the Secretary of
State, or, if the foreign limited partnership has selected an
alternative due date pursuant to subsection 10, on or before that
alternative due date, and annually thereafter on or before the last day
of the month in which the anniversary date of its qualification to do
business in this State occurs in each year, or, if applicable, on or
before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of the
alternative due date occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of
State a list, on a form furnished by the Secretary of State, that
contains:
(a) The name of the foreign limited partnership;
(b) The file number of the foreign limited partnership, if known;
(c) The names of all its general partners;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each general
partner; and
(e) The signature of a general partner of the foreign limited
partnership, or some other person specifically authorized by the
-
*SB75_R1*

– 65 –
foreign limited partnership to sign the list, certifying that the list is
true, complete and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to this section must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The foreign limited partnership has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The foreign limited partnership acknowledges that pursuant
to NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any
false or forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(c) None of the general partners identified in the list has been
identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a general partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by this section, the foreign limited
partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by this section, the foreign limited
partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid for filing the initial list and each
annual list required by this section, which must not exceed $150.
If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the amount of
such a fee, upon filing the initial list and each annual list, the
foreign limited partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee
in the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
4. If a foreign limited partnership files an amended list of
general partners with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the
date on which the initial list required by this section is filed, the
foreign limited partnership or the resigning general partner is not
required to pay a fee for filing the amended list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a general
partner of a foreign limited partnership resigns and the resignation is
not reflected on the annual or amended list of general partners, the
foreign limited partnership or the resigning general partner shall pay
to the Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation of the
general partner.
6. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
foreign limited partnership, which is required to comply with the
provisions of NRS 87A.560 to 87A.600, inclusive, and which has
not become delinquent, a notice of the fee due pursuant to
subsection 3 and a reminder to file the list required pursuant to
subsection 1. Failure of any foreign limited partnership to receive a
-
*SB75_R1*

– 66 –
notice does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by the provisions
of NRS 87A.560 to 87A.600, inclusive.
7. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
8. An annual list for a foreign limited partnership not in default
which is received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before
its due date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year
and does not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to
which the due date is applicable.
9. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list required
by this section which identifies a general partner with the fraudulent
intent of concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising
the power or authority of a general partner in furtherance of any
unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
10. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign limited
partnership to select an alternative due date for filing the initial list
required by this section.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 10.
Sec. 52. NRS 87A.585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.585 1. Each foreign limited partnership which is
required to make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS
87A.560 to 87A.600, inclusive, and which refuses or neglects to do
so within the time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75 and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid on
or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of
the foreign limited partnership occurs, the defaulting foreign limited
partnership by reason of its default forfeits its right to transact any
business within this State. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the penalty that must be paid for default,
which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the penalty for default, the penalty for default must be
in the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
The fee and penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 53. NRS 87A.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
87A.595 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3
and 4 and NRS 87A.580, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a
foreign limited partnership which has forfeited or which forfeits its
right to transact business under the provisions of this chapter and
shall restore to the foreign limited partnership its right to transact
business in this State, and to exercise its privileges and immunities,
if it:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 67 –
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required by NRS 87A.560;
(2) The statement required by NRS 87A.565, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected general partners of the foreign limited partnership;
and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 87A.560 and
87A.585 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 87A.565, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the foreign
limited partnership must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the foreign limited
partnership, the Secretary of State shall issue to the foreign
limited partnership a certificate of reinstatement if the foreign
limited partnership:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 87A.315.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a foreign limited partnership to transact
business in this State has been forfeited pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter and has remained forfeited for a period of 5 consecutive
years, the right is not subject to reinstatement.
5. A reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the
date on which the foreign limited partnership forfeited its right to
transact business under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates
the foreign limited partnership’s right to transact business as if such
right had at all times remained in full force and effect.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 68 –
Sec. 53.5. NRS 87A.602 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
87A.602 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a foreign
limited partnership whose right to transact business in this State has
been revoked to cancel its registration in this State without paying
additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for filing a
certificate of cancellation required by NRS 87A.315,] if the foreign
limited partnership provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary
of State that the foreign limited partnership did not transact business
in this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its registration in this
State was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its registration in
this State was revoked and the foreign limited partnership paid the
fees and penalties for the portion of that period in which the foreign
limited partnership transacted business in this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 54. NRS 88.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.320 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 88.6065, the
name proposed for a limited partnership as set forth in its certificate
of limited partnership:
(a) Must contain the words “Limited Partnership,” or the
abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.”;
(b) May not contain the name of a limited partner unless:
(1) It is also the name of a general partner or the corporate
name of a corporate general partner; or
(2) The business of the limited partnership had been carried
on under that name before the admission of that limited partner; and
(c) Must be distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of
State from the names of all other artificial persons formed,
organized, registered or qualified pursuant to the provisions of this
title that are on file in the Office of the Secretary of State and all
names that are reserved in the Office of the Secretary of State
pursuant to the provisions of this title. If the name on the certificate
of limited partnership submitted to the Secretary of State is not
distinguishable from any name on file or reserved name, the
Secretary of State shall return the certificate to the filer, unless
the written, acknowledged consent to the use of the same or the
requested similar name of the holder of the name on file or reserved
name accompanies the certificate of limited partnership.
2. For the purposes of this section, a proposed name is not
distinguished from a name on file or reserved name solely because
one or the other contains distinctive lettering, a distinctive mark, a
trademark or a trade name, or any combination thereof.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 69 –
3. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the limited partnership contains the word “accountant,”
“accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or “auditing” unless the
Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies that the limited
partnership:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the limited partnership is
not engaged in the practice of accounting and is not offering to
practice accounting in this State.
4. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the limited partnership contains the word “bank” or “trust”
unless:
(a) It appears from the certificate of limited partnership that the
limited partnership proposes to carry on business as a banking or
trust company, exclusively or in connection with its business as a
bank, savings and loan association, savings bank or thrift company;
and
(b) The certificate of limited partnership is first approved by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if it appears
from the certificate of limited partnership that the business to be
carried on by the limited partnership is subject to supervision by the
Commissioner of Insurance or by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions, unless the certificate of limited partnership is approved
by the Commissioner who will supervise the business of the limited
partnership.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any certificate of limited
partnership for any limited partnership formed or existing pursuant
to the laws of this State which provides that the name of the limited
partnership contains the words “engineer,” “engineered,”
“engineering,” “professional engineer,” “registered engineer” or
“licensed engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the limited partnership are
licensed to practice engineering pursuant to the laws of this State; or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 70 –
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the limited partnership is exempt from the
prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any certificate of limited
partnership for any limited partnership formed or existing pursuant
to the laws of this State which provides that the name of the limited
partnership contains the words “architect,” “architecture,”
“registered architect,” “licensed architect,” “registered interior
designer,” “registered interior design,” “residential designer,”
“registered residential designer,” “licensed residential designer” or
“residential design” unless [the] :
(a) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design certifies that:
[(a)] (1) The principals of the limited partnership are holders of
a certificate of registration to practice architecture or residential
design or to practice as a registered interior designer, as applicable,
pursuant to the laws of this State; or
[(b)] (2) The limited partnership is qualified to do business in
this State pursuant to NRS 623.349 [.] ; or
(b) The principals of the limited partnership present
documentation satisfactory to the Secretary of State showing that:
(1) The principals are holders of a certificate of registration
to practice architecture or residential design or to practice as a
registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to the laws of
this State; or
(2) The limited partnership is qualified to do business in
this State pursuant to NRS 623.349.
8. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any
certificate of limited partnership for any limited partnership formed
or existing pursuant to the laws of this State which provides that the
name of the limited partnership contains the words “common-
interest community,” “community association,” “master
association,” “unit-owners’ association” or “homeowners’
association” or if it appears in the certificate of limited partnership
that the purpose of the limited partnership is to operate as a unit-
owners’ association pursuant to chapter 116 or 116B of NRS unless
the Administrator of the Real Estate Division of the Department of
Business and Industry certifies that the limited partnership has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 71 –
9. The name of a limited partnership whose right to transact
business has been forfeited, which has merged and is not the
surviving entity or whose existence has otherwise terminated is
available for use by any other artificial person.
10. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations that interpret
the requirements of this section.
Sec. 55. NRS 88.338 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.338 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 56. NRS 88.395 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.395 1. A limited partnership shall, at the time of the filing
of its certificate of limited partnership with the Secretary of State,
or, if the limited partnership has selected an alternative due date
pursuant to subsection 12, on or before that alternative due date, and
annually thereafter on or before the last day of the month in which
the anniversary date of the filing of its certificate of limited
partnership occurs, or, if applicable, on or before the last day of the
month in which the anniversary date of the alternative due date
occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of State, on a form
furnished by the Secretary of State, a list that contains:
(a) The name of the limited partnership;
(b) The file number of the limited partnership, if known;
(c) The names of all of its general partners;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each general
partner; and
(e) The signature of a general partner of the limited partnership,
or some other person specifically authorized by the limited
partnership to sign the list, certifying that the list is true, complete
and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to subsection 1 must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The limited partnership has complied with the provisions of
chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The limited partnership acknowledges that pursuant to NRS
239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 72 –
forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State;
and
(c) None of the general partners identified in the list has been
identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a general partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 4, a limited partnership shall, upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, pay to the Secretary
of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid by a limited partnership for filing
the initial list and each annual list required by subsection 1, which
must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the initial list and
each annual list, the limited partnership shall pay to the Secretary
of State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
4. [A] Except as otherwise required by this subsection, a
registered limited-liability limited partnership shall, upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, pay to the Secretary
of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $200.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee which must be paid by a registered limited-liability
limited partnership for filing the initial list and each annual list
required by subsection 1. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the initial list and
each annual list, the registered limited-liability limited partnership
shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee in the amount established
by the Secretary of State by regulation.
5. If a limited partnership files an amended list of general
partners with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the date on
which the initial list required by subsection 1 is filed, the limited
partnership or the resigning general partner is not required to pay a
fee for filing the amended list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if a general
partner of a limited partnership resigns and the resignation is not
reflected on the annual or amended list of general partners, the
limited partnership or the resigning general partner shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 73 –
7. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
limited partnership which is required to comply with the provisions
of this section, and which has not become delinquent, a notice of the
fee due pursuant to the provisions of subsection 3 or 4, as
appropriate, and a reminder to file the annual list required pursuant
to subsection 1. Failure of any limited partnership to receive a notice
does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by NRS 88.400.
8. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 or 4 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
9. An annual list for a limited partnership not in default that is
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year and does
not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to which the
due date is applicable.
10. A filing made pursuant to this section does not satisfy the
provisions of NRS 88.355 and may not be substituted for filings
submitted pursuant to NRS 88.355.
11. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list
required by subsection 1 which identifies a general partner with the
fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or persons
exercising the power or authority of a general partner in furtherance
of any unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in
NRS 225.084.
12. The Secretary of State may allow a limited partnership to
select an alternative due date for filing the initial list required by
subsection 1.
13. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 12.
Sec. 57. NRS 88.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.400 1. If a limited partnership has filed the list in
compliance with NRS 88.395 and has paid the appropriate fee for
the filing, the cancelled check or other proof of payment received by
the limited partnership constitutes a certificate authorizing it to
transact its business within this State until the anniversary date of
the filing of its certificate of limited partnership in the next
succeeding calendar year.
2. Each limited partnership which is required to make a filing
and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 88.395 and 88.397 and which
refuses or neglects to do so within the time provided is in default.
3. Upon notification from the Administrator of the Real Estate
Division of the Department of Business and Industry that a limited
partnership which is a unit-owners’ association as defined in
NRS 116.011 or 116B.030 has failed to register pursuant to
-
*SB75_R1*

– 74 –
NRS 116.31158 or 116B.625 or failed to pay the fees pursuant to
NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State shall deem the
limited partnership to be in default. If, after the limited partnership
is deemed to be in default, the Administrator notifies the Secretary
of State that the limited partnership has registered pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625 and paid the fees pursuant to NRS
116.31155 or 116B.620, the Secretary of State shall reinstate the
limited partnership if the limited partnership complies with the
requirements for reinstatement as provided in this section and
NRS 88.410.
4. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75, and unless the filings are made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the first day of the first anniversary of the month
following the month in which filing was required, the defaulting
limited partnership, by reason of its default, forfeits its right to
transact any business within this State. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the penalty that must be paid
for default, which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the penalty for default, the penalty for
default must be in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
Sec. 58. NRS 88.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.410 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 88.3355, the Secretary of State shall reinstate any limited
partnership which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to transact
business under the provisions of this chapter and restore to the
limited partnership its right to carry on business in this State, and to
exercise its privileges and immunities if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required pursuant to NRS 88.395;
(2) The statement required by NRS 88.397, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected general partners of the limited partnership; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 88.395 and
88.400 for each year or portion thereof during which the certificate
has been revoked;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 88.397, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
-
*SB75_R1*

– 75 –
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the limited
partnership must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the limited
partnership, the Secretary of State shall issue to the limited
partnership a certificate of reinstatement if the limited partnership:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 88.415.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation
occurred only by reason of failure to pay the fees and penalties.
4. If a limited partnership’s certificate has been revoked
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and has remained revoked
for a period of 5 years, the certificate must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 88.327, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the limited partnership forfeited its right to transact business
under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the limited
partnership’s right to transact business as if such right had at all
times remained in full force and effect.
Sec. 59. NRS 88.415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.415 The Secretary of State, for services relating to the
official duties of the Secretary of State and the records of the Office
of the Secretary of State, shall charge and collect the following fees:
1. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
filing a certificate of limited partnership, or for registering a foreign
limited partnership, $75. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the fee for filing a certificate of limited
partnership or for registering a foreign limited partnership, which
must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the amount of such a fee, the fee for filing a certificate
of limited partnership, or for registering a foreign limited
partnership, must be in the amount established by the Secretary of
State by regulation.
2. For filing a certificate of registration of limited-liability
limited partnership, or for registering a foreign registered limited-
liability limited partnership, $100.
3. For filing a certificate of amendment of limited partnership
or restated certificate of limited partnership, $175.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 76 –
4. For certifying a copy of a certificate of limited partnership,
an amendment to the certificate, or a certificate as amended, $30 per
certification.
5. For certifying an authorized printed copy of the limited
partnership law, $30.
6. For reserving a limited partnership name, or for signing,
filing or certifying any other record, $25.
7. For copies provided by the Office of the Secretary of State,
$2 per page.
[8. For filing a certificate of cancellation of a limited
partnership, $100.]
 Except as otherwise provided in this section, the fees set forth in
NRS 78.785 apply to this chapter.
Sec. 59.5. NRS 88.548 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.548 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a limited
partnership whose certificate of limited partnership has been
revoked to dissolve without paying additional fees and penalties [,
other than the fee for filing a certificate of cancellation required by
NRS 88.415,] if the limited partnership provides evidence
satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the limited partnership did
not transact business in this State or as a limited partnership
organized pursuant to the laws of this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its certificate of limited
partnership was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its certificate of
limited partnership was revoked and the limited partnership paid the
fees and penalties for the portion of that period in which the limited
partnership transacted business in this State or as a limited
partnership organized pursuant to the laws of this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 60. NRS 88.591 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.591 1. Each foreign limited partnership doing business in
this State shall, at the time of the filing of its application for
registration as a foreign limited partnership with the Secretary of
State, or, if the foreign limited partnership has selected an
alternative due date pursuant to subsection 10, on or before that
alternative due date, and annually thereafter on or before the last day
of the month in which the anniversary date of its qualification to do
business in this State occurs in each year, or, if applicable, on or
before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of the
alternative due date occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of
State a list, on a form furnished by the Secretary of State, that
contains:
(a) The name of the foreign limited partnership;
-
*SB75_R1*

– 77 –
(b) The file number of the foreign limited partnership, if known;
(c) The names of all its general partners;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each general
partner; and
(e) The signature of a general partner of the foreign limited
partnership, or some other person specifically authorized by the
foreign limited partnership to sign the list, certifying that the list is
true, complete and accurate.
2. Each list filed pursuant to this section must be accompanied
by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The foreign limited partnership has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The foreign limited partnership acknowledges that pursuant
to NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any
false or forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(c) None of the general partners identified in the list has been
identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a general partner in furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by this section, the foreign limited
partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by this section, the foreign limited
partnership shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee for filing the initial list and each annual list required by
this section, which must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the
initial list and each annual list, the foreign limited partnership
shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee in the amount established
by the Secretary of State by regulation.
4. If a foreign limited partnership files an amended list of
general partners with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the
date on which the initial list required by this section is filed, the
foreign limited partnership or the resigning general partner is not
required to pay a fee for filing the amended list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a general
partner of a foreign limited partnership resigns and the resignation is
not reflected on the annual or amended list of general partners, the
foreign limited partnership or the resigning general partner shall pay
to the Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation of the
general partner.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 78 –
6. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
foreign limited partnership, which is required to comply with the
provisions of NRS 88.591 to 88.5945, inclusive, and which has not
become delinquent, a notice of the fee due pursuant to subsection 3
and a reminder to file the list required pursuant to subsection 1.
Failure of any foreign limited partnership to receive a notice does
not excuse it from the penalty imposed by the provisions of NRS
88.591 to 88.5945, inclusive.
7. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
8. An annual list for a foreign limited partnership not in default
which is received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before
its due date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year
and does not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to
which the due date is applicable.
9. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list required
by this section which identifies a general partner with the fraudulent
intent of concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising
the power or authority of a general partner in furtherance of any
unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
10. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign limited
partnership to select an alternative due date for filing the initial list
required by this section.
11. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 10.
Sec. 61. NRS 88.593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.593 1. Each foreign limited partnership which is required
to make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 88.591 to
88.5945, inclusive, and which refuses or neglects to do so within the
time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75 and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid on
or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of
the foreign limited partnership occurs, the defaulting foreign limited
partnership by reason of its default forfeits its right to transact any
business within this State. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the penalty that must be paid for default,
which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the penalty for default, the penalty for default must be
in the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
The fee and penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 79 –
Sec. 62. NRS 88.594 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.594 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 88.5927, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a foreign
limited partnership which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to
transact business under the provisions of this chapter and shall
restore to the foreign limited partnership its right to transact
business in this State, and to exercise its privileges and immunities,
if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required by NRS 88.591;
(2) The statement required by NRS 88.5915, if applicable;
(3) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(4) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected general partners of the foreign limited partnership;
and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 88.591 and
88.593 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited;
(2) The fee set forth in NRS 88.5915, if applicable; and
(3) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the foreign
limited partnership must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the foreign limited
partnership, the Secretary of State shall issue to the foreign
limited partnership a certificate of reinstatement if the foreign
limited partnership:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 88.415.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a foreign limited partnership to transact
business in this State has been forfeited pursuant to the provisions of
-
*SB75_R1*

– 80 –
this chapter and has remained forfeited for a period of 5 consecutive
years, the right is not subject to reinstatement.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 88.5945, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the foreign limited partnership forfeited its right to transact
business under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the
foreign limited partnership’s right to transact business as if such
right had at all times remained in full force and effect.
Sec. 62.5. NRS 88.5947 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88.5947 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a foreign
limited partnership whose right to transact business in this State has
been revoked to cancel its registration in this State without paying
additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for filing a
certificate of cancellation required by NRS 88.415,] if the foreign
limited partnership provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary
of State that the foreign limited partnership did not transact business
in this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its registration in this
State was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its registration in
this State was revoked and the foreign limited partnership paid the
fees and penalties for the portion of that period in which the foreign
limited partnership transacted business in this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 63. NRS 88A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.600 1. A business trust formed pursuant to this chapter
shall, at the time of the filing of its certificate of trust with the
Secretary of State, or, if the business trust has selected an alternative
due date pursuant to subsection 9, on or before that alternative due
date, and annually thereafter on or before the last day of the month
in which the anniversary date of the filing of its certificate of trust
with the Secretary of State occurs, file with the Secretary of State,
or, if applicable, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, on a
form furnished by the Secretary of State, a list signed by at least one
trustee, or by some other person specifically authorized by the
business trust to sign the list, that contains the name and street
address of at least one trustee. Each list filed pursuant to this
subsection must be accompanied by a declaration under penalty of
perjury that:
(a) The business trust has complied with the provisions of
chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The business trust acknowledges that pursuant to NRS
239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false or
-
*SB75_R1*

– 81 –
forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State;
and
(c) None of the trustees identified in the list has been identified
in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any
person or persons exercising the power or authority of a trustee in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
2. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, the business trust
shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 1, the business trust
shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee for filing the initial list and each annual list required by
subsection 1, which must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the
initial list and each annual list, the business trust shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee in the amount established by the Secretary
of State by regulation.
3. If a business trust files an amended list of trustees with the
Secretary of State within 60 days after the date on which the initial
list required by subsection 1 is filed, the business trust or the
resigning trustee is not required to pay a fee for filing the amended
list.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if a trustee of
a business trust resigns and the resignation is not reflected on the
annual or amended list of trustees, the business trust or the resigning
trustee shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the
resignation.
5. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
business trust which is required to comply with the provisions of
NRS 88A.600 to 88A.665, inclusive, and which has not become
delinquent, a notice of the fee due pursuant to subsection 2 and a
reminder to file the list required pursuant to subsection 1. Failure of
a business trust to receive a notice does not excuse it from the
penalty imposed by law.
6. An annual list for a business trust not in default which is
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year.
7. A person who files with the Secretary of State an initial list
or annual list required by subsection 1 which identifies a trustee
with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any person or
persons exercising the power or authority of a trustee in furtherance
-
*SB75_R1*

– 82 –
of any unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in
NRS 225.084.
8. For the purposes of this section, a person who is a beneficial
owner is not deemed to exercise actual control of the daily
operations of a business trust based solely on the fact that the person
is a beneficial owner.
9. The Secretary of State may allow a business trust to select
an alternative due date for filing the initial list required by
subsection 1.
10. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 9.
Sec. 64. NRS 88A.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.630 1. Each business trust required to file the list and
pay the fee prescribed in NRS 88A.600 to 88A.665, inclusive,
which refuses or neglects to do so within the time provided shall be
deemed in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default, there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the penalty that must be paid for default, which must
not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation
the penalty for default, the penalty for default must be in the
amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation. The fee
and penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 65. NRS 88A.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.650 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3
and 4 and NRS 88A.345, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a
business trust which has forfeited or which forfeits its right to
transact business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and shall
restore to the business trust its right to carry on business in this
State, and to exercise its privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required by NRS 88A.600;
(2) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected trustees of the business trust; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 88A.600 and
88A.630 for each year or portion thereof during which its certificate
of trust was revoked; and
(2) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
-
*SB75_R1*

– 83 –
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the business
trust must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for reinstatement in
the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the business trust, the
Secretary of State shall issue to the business trust a certificate of
reinstatement if the business trust:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 88A.900.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation of
the certificate of trust occurred only by reason of the failure to file
the list or pay the fees and penalties.
4. If a certificate of business trust has been revoked pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter and has remained revoked for a period
of 5 consecutive years, the certificate must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 88A.660, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date on
which the business trust forfeited its right to transact business under
the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the business trust’s right
to transact business as if such right had at all times remained in full
force and effect.
Sec. 65.5. NRS 88A.665 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
88A.665 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a business
trust whose certificate of trust has been revoked to cancel its
certificate of trust without paying additional fees and penalties [,
other than the fee for filing a certificate of cancellation required by
NRS 88A.900,] if the business trust provides evidence satisfactory
to the Secretary of State that the business trust did not transact
business in this State or as a business trust organized pursuant to the
laws of this State:
(a) During the entire period for which its certificate of trust was
revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its certificate of
trust was revoked and the business trust paid the fees and penalties
for the portion of that period in which the business trust transacted
business in this State or as a business trust organized pursuant to the
laws of this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 84 –
Sec. 66. NRS 88A.732 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.732 1. Each foreign business trust doing business in this
State shall, at the time of the filing of its application for registration
as a foreign business trust with the Secretary of State, or, if the
foreign business trust has selected an alternative due date pursuant
to subsection 11, on or before that alternative due date, and annually
thereafter on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of its qualification to do business in this State
occurs in each year, or, if applicable, on or before the last day of the
month in which the anniversary date of the alternative due date
occurs in each year, file with the Secretary of State a list, on a form
furnished by the Secretary of State, that contains:
(a) The name of the foreign business trust;
(b) The file number of the foreign business trust, if known;
(c) The name of at least one of its trustees;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of the trustee listed
pursuant to paragraph (c); and
(e) The signature of a trustee of the foreign business trust, or
some other person specifically authorized by the foreign business
trust to sign the list, certifying that the list is true, complete and
accurate.
2. Each list required to be filed pursuant to this section must be
accompanied by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The foreign business trust has complied with the provisions
of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The foreign business trust acknowledges that pursuant to
NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false
or forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(c) None of the trustees identified in the list has been identified
in the list with the fraudulent intent of concealing the identity of any
person or persons exercising the power or authority of a trustee in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
3. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by this section, the foreign business
trust shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by this section, the foreign business
trust shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee for filing the initial list and each annual list required by
this section, which must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the
initial list and each annual list, the foreign business trust shall pay
-
*SB75_R1*

– 85 –
to the Secretary of State a fee in the amount established by the
Secretary of State by regulation.
4. If a foreign business trust files an amended list of trustees
with the Secretary of State within 60 days after the date on which
the initial list required by this section is filed, the foreign business
trust or the resigning trustee is not required to pay a fee for filing the
amended list.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a trustee of
a foreign business trust resigns and the resignation is not reflected
on the annual or amended list of trustees, the foreign business trust
or the resigning trustee shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of
$75 to file the resignation.
6. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each annual list required by subsection 1, provide to each
foreign business trust which is required to comply with the
provisions of NRS 88A.732 to 88A.738, inclusive, and which has
not become delinquent, a notice of the fee due pursuant to
subsection 3 and a reminder to file the list required pursuant to
subsection 1. Failure of any foreign business trust to receive a notice
does not excuse it from the penalty imposed by the provisions of
NRS 88A.732 to 88A.738, inclusive.
7. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 is defective or the fee required by subsection 3 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
8. An annual list for a foreign business trust not in default
which is received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before
its due date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year
and does not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1 for the year to
which the due date is applicable.
9. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list required
by this section which identifies a trustee with the fraudulent intent of
concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising the
power or authority of a trustee in furtherance of any unlawful
conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
10. For the purposes of this section, a person who is a
beneficial owner is not deemed to exercise actual control of the
daily operations of a foreign business trust based solely on the fact
that the person is a beneficial owner.
11. The Secretary of State may allow a foreign business trust to
select an alternative due date for filing the initial list required by this
section.
12. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 11.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 86 –
Sec. 67. NRS 88A.735 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.735 1. Each foreign business trust which is required to
make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 88A.732 to
88A.738, inclusive, and which refuses or neglects to do so within
the time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75, and unless the filing is made and the fee and penalty are paid
on or before the last day of the month in which the anniversary date
of the foreign business trust occurs, the defaulting foreign business
trust by reason of its default forfeits its right to transact any business
within this State. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the penalty that must be paid for default,
which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by
regulation the penalty for default, the penalty for default must be
in the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
The fee and penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 68. NRS 88A.737 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.737 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3
and 4 and NRS 88A.7345, the Secretary of State shall reinstate a
foreign business trust which has forfeited or which forfeits its right
to transact business under the provisions of this chapter and shall
restore to the foreign business trust its right to transact business in
this State, and to exercise its privileges and immunities, if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list required by NRS 88A.732;
(2) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected trustees of the foreign business trust; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 88A.732 and
88A.735 for each year or portion thereof that its right to transact
business was forfeited; and
(2) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the foreign
business trust must pay to the Secretary of State a fee for
reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of State
by regulation.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 87 –
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the foreign business
trust, the Secretary of State shall issue to the foreign business trust a
certificate of reinstatement if the foreign business trust:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to NRS 88A.900.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid and the revocation of
the right to transact business occurred only by reason of failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the right of a foreign business trust to transact business in
this State has been forfeited pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter and has remained forfeited for a period of 5 consecutive
years, the right to transact business must not be reinstated.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 88A.738, a
reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the date the
foreign business trust forfeited its right to transact business under
the provisions of this chapter and reinstates the foreign business
trust’s right to transact business as if such right had at all times
remained in full force and effect.
Sec. 68.5. NRS 88A.739 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
88A.739 1. The Secretary of State shall authorize a foreign
business trust whose right to transact business in this State has been
revoked to cancel its registration in this State without paying
additional fees and penalties [, other than the fee for filing a
certificate of cancellation required by NRS 88A.900,] if the foreign
business trust provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of
State that the foreign business trust did not transact business in this
State:
(a) During the entire period for which its right to transact
business in this State was revoked; or
(b) During a portion of the period for which its right to transact
business in this State was revoked and the foreign business trust
paid the fees and penalties for the portion of that period in which the
foreign business trust transacted business in this State.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 69. NRS 88A.900 is hereby amended to read as follows:
88A.900 The Secretary of State shall charge and collect the
following fees for:
1. [Filing] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
filing an original certificate of trust, or for registering a foreign
business trust, $75. The Secretary of State may establish by
regulation the amount of the fee for filing an original certificate
-
*SB75_R1*

– 88 –
of trust or for registering a foreign business trust, which must not
exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation the
amount of such a fee, the amount of the fee for filing an original
certificate of trust, or for registering a foreign business trust, must
be the amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation.
2. Filing an amendment or restatement, or a combination
thereof, to a certificate of trust, $175.
3. [Filing a certificate of cancellation, $100.
4.] Certifying a copy of a certificate of trust or an amendment
or restatement, or a combination thereof, $30 per certification.
[5.] 4. Certifying an authorized printed copy of this chapter,
$30.
[6.] 5. Reserving a name for a business trust, $25.
[7.] 6. Signing a certificate of existence of a business trust
which does not list the previous records relating to it, or a certificate
of change in the name of a business trust, $50.
[8.] 7. Signing a certificate of existence of a business trust
which lists the previous records relating to it, $50.
[9.] 8. Signing, certifying or filing any certificate or record not
otherwise provided for in this section, $50.
[10.] 9. Examining and provisionally approving a record
before the record is presented for filing, $125.
[11.] 10. Copying a record on file with the Secretary of State,
for each page, $2.
Sec. 70. NRS 89.027 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.027 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no record
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of that record into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 71. NRS 89.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.210 1. Within 30 days after the organization of a
professional association under this chapter, the association shall file
with the Secretary of State a copy of the articles of association, duly
signed, and , except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall
pay at that time a filing fee of $75. A copy of any amendments to
the articles of association must also be filed with the Secretary of
State within 30 days after the adoption of such amendments. Each
-
*SB75_R1*

– 89 –
copy of amendments so filed must be certified as true and correct
and be accompanied by a filing fee of $175.
2. The name of such a professional association must contain
the words “Professional Association,” “Professional Organization”
or the abbreviations “Prof. Ass’n” or “Prof. Org.” The association
may render professional services and exercise its authorized powers
under a fictitious name if the association has first registered the
name in the manner required under chapter 602 of NRS.
3. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the fee
for filing a copy of the articles of association, which is required by
subsection 1, which must not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a filing fee, the
professional association shall pay the filing fee required by
subsection 1 in the amount established by the Secretary of State by
regulation.
Sec. 72. NRS 89.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.250 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
professional association shall, at the time of the filing of its articles
of association with the Secretary of State, or, if the professional
association has selected an alternative due date pursuant to
subsection 8, on or before that alternative due date, and annually
thereafter on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of its organization occurs in each year, or, if
applicable, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, file
with the Secretary of State a list showing the names and addresses,
either residence or business, of all members and employees in the
professional association and certifying that all members and
employees are licensed to render professional service in this State.
2. A professional association organized and practicing pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter and NRS 623.349 shall, at the time
of the filing of its articles of association with the Secretary of State,
or, if the professional association has selected an alternative due
date pursuant to subsection 8, on or before that alternative due date,
and annually thereafter on or before the last day of the month in
which the anniversary date of its organization occurs in each year,
or, if applicable, on or before the last day of the month in which the
anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in each year, file
with the Secretary of State a list:
(a) Showing the names and addresses, either residence or
business, of all members and employees of the professional
association who are licensed or otherwise authorized by law to
render professional service in this State;
-
*SB75_R1*

– 90 –
(b) Certifying that all members and employees who render
professional service are licensed or otherwise authorized by law to
render professional service in this State; and
(c) Certifying that all members who are not licensed to render
professional service in this State do not render professional service
on behalf of the professional association except as authorized by
law.
3. Each list filed pursuant to this section must be:
(a) Made on a form furnished by the Secretary of State and must
not contain any fiscal or other information except that expressly
called for by this section.
(b) Signed by the chief executive officer of the professional
association or by some other person specifically authorized by the
chief executive officer to sign the list.
(c) Accompanied by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(1) The professional association has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(2) The professional association acknowledges that pursuant
to NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any
false or forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(3) None of the members or employees identified in the list
has been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of
concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising the
power or authority of a member or employee in furtherance of any
unlawful conduct.
4. [Upon] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by this section, the professional
association shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
(b) Each annual list required by this section, the professional
association shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
 The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the amount
of the fee for filing the initial list and each annual list required by
this section, which must not exceed $150. If the Secretary of State
establishes by regulation the amount of such a fee, upon filing the
initial list and each annual list, the professional association shall
pay to the Secretary of State a fee in the amount established by the
Secretary of State by regulation.
5. If a professional association files an amended list of
members and employees with the Secretary of State within 60 days
after the date on which the initial list required by this section is
filed, the professional association is not required to pay a fee for
filing the amended list.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 91 –
6. A person who files with the Secretary of State an initial list
or annual list required by this section which identifies a member or
an employee of a professional association with the fraudulent intent
of concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising the
power or authority of a member or employee in furtherance of any
unlawful conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
7. For the purposes of this section, a person is not deemed to
exercise actual control of the daily operations of a professional
association based solely on the fact that the person holds an
ownership interest in the professional association.
8. The Secretary of State may allow a professional association
to select an alternative due date for filing the initial list required by
this section.
9. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 8.
Sec. 73. NRS 89.252 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.252 1. Each professional association that is required to
make a filing and pay the fee prescribed in NRS 89.250 but refuses
to do so within the time provided is in default.
2. [For] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
default, there must be added to the amount of the fee a penalty of
$75. The Secretary of State may establish by regulation the
amount of the penalty that must be paid for default, which must
not exceed $75. If the Secretary of State establishes by regulation
the penalty for default, the penalty for default must be in the
amount established by the Secretary of State by regulation. The fee
and penalty must be collected as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 74. NRS 89.256 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.256 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4 and NRS 89.251, the Secretary of State shall reinstate any
professional association which has forfeited its right to transact
business under the provisions of this chapter and restore the right to
carry on business in this State and exercise its privileges and
immunities if it:
(a) Files with the Secretary of State:
(1) The list and certification required by NRS 89.250;
(2) The information required pursuant to NRS 77.310; and
(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury, on a form
provided by the Secretary of State, that the reinstatement is
authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State or by
the duly selected chief executive officer of the professional
association; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, pays to the
Secretary of State:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 92 –
(1) The filing fee and penalty set forth in NRS 89.250 and
89.252 for each year or portion thereof during which the articles of
association have been revoked; and
(2) [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
a fee of $300 for reinstatement. The Secretary of State may
establish by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement,
which must not exceed $300. If the Secretary of State establishes
by regulation the amount of the fee for reinstatement, the
professional association must pay to the Secretary of State a fee
for reinstatement in the amount established by the Secretary of
State by regulation.
2. When the Secretary of State reinstates the professional
association, the Secretary of State shall issue to the
professional association a certificate of reinstatement if the
professional association:
(a) Requests a certificate of reinstatement; and
(b) Pays the required fees pursuant to subsection 7 of
NRS 78.785.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.14057, the
Secretary of State shall not order a reinstatement unless all
delinquent fees and penalties have been paid, and the revocation of
the articles of association occurred only by reason of the failure to
pay the fees and penalties.
4. If the articles of association of a professional association
have been revoked pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and
have remained revoked for 10 consecutive years, the articles must
not be reinstated.
5. A reinstatement pursuant to this section relates back to the
date on which the professional association forfeited its right to
transact business under the provisions of this chapter and reinstates
the professional association’s right to transact business as if such
right had at all times remained in full force and effect.
Sec. 75. NRS 353.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.007 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
person shall not enter into a contract with the State of Nevada unless
the person is a holder of a state business license issued pursuant to
chapter 76 of NRS.
2. A person who is not a holder of a state business license may
enter into a contract with the State of Nevada if, pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection [7] 8 of NRS 76.100, the person is not
required to obtain a state business license.
3. The provisions of this section apply to all offices,
departments, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions, agencies
or any other units of:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 93 –
(a) The Legislative, Executive and Judicial Departments of the
State Government;
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education; and
(c) The Public Employees’ Retirement System.
Sec. 76. NRS 600.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
600.025 [No]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no document
which is written in a language other than English may be filed or
submitted for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unless it is accompanied by a
verified translation of the document into the English language.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State may accept for filing a
record which is written in a language other than English if the
Secretary of State determines that sufficient resources are
available to provide for a verified translation of that record into
the English language.
Sec. 77. NRS 600.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
600.340 1. A person who has adopted and is using a mark in
this State may file in the Office of the Secretary of State, on a form
to be furnished by the Secretary of State, an application for
registration of that mark setting forth, but not limited to, the
following information:
(a) Whether the mark to be registered is a trademark, trade name
or service mark;
(b) A description of the mark by name, words displayed in it or
other information;
(c) The name and business address of the person applying for
the registration and, if it is a corporation, limited-liability company,
limited partnership or registered limited-liability partnership, the
state of incorporation or organization;
(d) The specific goods or services in connection with which the
mark is used and the mode or manner in which the mark is used in
connection with those goods or services and the class as designated
[by the Secretary of State] pursuant to NRS 600.400 which includes
those goods or services;
(e) The date when the mark was first used anywhere and the
date when it was first used in this State by the applicant or his or her
predecessor in business which must precede the filing of the
application; and
(f) A statement that the applicant is the owner of the mark and
that no other person has the right to use the mark in this State either
in the form set forth in the application or in such near resemblance
to it as might deceive or cause mistake.
2. The application must:
-
*SB75_R1*

– 94 –
(a) Be signed and verified by the applicant or by a member of
the firm or an officer of the corporation or association applying.
(b) Be accompanied by a specimen or facsimile of the mark on
white paper that is 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches in size and by a filing
fee of $100 payable to the Secretary of State.
3. If the application fails to comply with this section or NRS
600.343, the Secretary of State shall return it for correction.
Sec. 78. NRS 600.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
600.370 1. A mark and its registration are assignable with the
good will of the business in which the mark is used, or with that part
of the good will of the business connected with the use of and
symbolized by the mark. An assignment must:
(a) Be [in writing;] made upon a form prescribed by the
Secretary of State;
(b) Be signed and acknowledged by the registrant or his or her
successor or a member of the firm or an officer of the corporation or
association under whose name the mark is registered; and
(c) Be recorded with the Secretary of State upon the payment of
a fee of $100 to the Secretary of State who, upon recording the
assignment, shall issue in the name of the assignee a certificate of
assignment for the remainder of the period of the registration.
2. An assignment of any registration is void as against any
subsequent purchaser for valuable consideration without notice,
unless:
(a) The assignment is recorded with the Secretary of State
within 3 months after the date of the assignment; or
(b) The assignment is recorded before the subsequent purchase.
Sec. 79. NRS 600.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
600.400 1. The [Secretary of State may adopt regulations
defining general] classes of goods and services for which a mark
may be registered [. Classes defined pursuant to this subsection]
shall be the classes listed in the international schedule of classes
of goods and services adopted by the United States Patent and
Trademark Office, 37 C.F.R. § 6.1. Such classes are deemed to be
for administrative convenience and must not be deemed to be
exclusive or limit or extend the rights of the applicant or registrant.
2. A single application for registration of a mark may include
any goods within their class on which the mark is used, or any
services within their class rendered in connection with the mark. If a
mark is used for more than one class of goods or more than one
class of services the applicant must file a separate application for
each class.
-
*SB75_R1*

– 95 –
Sec. 79.3. Chapter 623 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Board may, in lieu of all examinations for a certificate of
registration to practice architecture, accept satisfactory evidence
that an applicant is a laureate of the Pritzker Architecture Prize.
Sec. 79.7. NRS 78.780 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 80. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
78.780 Filing fee: Certificate of dissolution. The fee for
filing a certificate of dissolution, whether it occurs before or after
payment of capital and beginning of business, is $100.
H
-
*SB75_R1*